It has been a terribly long time since I had played along with the Bellarific Friday Challenges. I had also gotten a new stash of those Uptown Girls, and they were just begging for ink!
It's like the painting in Frank O'Hara's Why I Am Not a Painter, in which a painting called Sardines ends up as a painting without sardines in it, because "it was too much." The idea of sardines is in the title but not in the painting anymore. So this kind of poem is partly an abstraction from the world, rather than a direct reflection of the world.
By IUSB Vision Editor Chuck Norton
We emerge from the trees onto open grassland packed with bank holiday sun worshippers. Being near the windmill, built in 1817 and a museum since 1976, this is a honeypot site on the Common, and the car park and café are bustling. We hurry on, keen to avoid the crowds, and head back into woodland, downhill along the course of a stream, which with the lack of recent rain is now a muddy silent seep. If it were flowing, the stream would run into Queen’s Mere, the tree-lined lake at the foot of the wooded slope. The glassy surface reflects the surrounding oaks, only faintly rippled as a solitary swan gracefully glides across the water.
I can go anywhere!
My sister finally arrived and the festivities started with a two-hour drive with my sister to Raleigh. It was a nice time to catch up with my sister since we haven’t seen each other since Christmas. We met Elizabeth at a Holiday Inn, which surprisingly was the same one we had used for Ron’s brother’s wedding. Elizabeth and I had been scheming up this trip for a few weeks now. My birthday was on the 21 and her’s is on the 31, and we always talk about spending it together, which I am so glad we did.
At this point, I assume you are sitting there, watching and listening to this audio-video presentation and saying, “Okay, Michael, what you say is stark and frightening. But it makes sense, the way you’ve laid out the facts.”
busy worrying about how good they’re doing to notice anyway.
Tainted love, tainted love, tainted love
Facilitator: Kim Wildman is a published travel writer and guidebook author with more than 10 years experience freelancing for a variety of media outlets around the world. She has authored more than 15 guidebooks, including Lonely Planet and Bradt travel guides, and written scores of travel features for the likes of The Melbourne Age, The Sydney Morning Herald, Travel Africa, Voyageur and Ninemsn. When she's not continent-hopping, Kim runs travel writing workshops and mentors writers from her base in Bangalow. Recently voted one of Tripbase's 100 Favourite Travel Writers in the world, she also presents guest lectures on travel writing at universities and schools and speaks about her passion for the written road at international literary festivals and travel fairs. See her website for more details: www.wildwriting.com.au.
Now you know how uncool we are. We must be the only people on the planet who own a television and haven’t watched Mad Men. I’ve heard all the chatter about it over the past four years, but we never watched it. After listening to someone rave about it for the umpteenth time, I finally set the DVR to catch it. The first season is running back-to-back episodes now. Since H can’t do anything but lay around, we decided to see what all the fuss is about.
You want the life they give to you or the life you’ve imagined ?
A few months later I told my boss I would like to have New Years Eve off. It was my girlfriends and my anniversary and she and I deserved an evening to celebrate. He said “No.” “But this is November….. Im giving you over a months notice.” “No”
This picture was taken shortly after we arrived and I checked in at the front desk of the Surgical floor. When my Dad and Step-Mom arrived, we all sat in the waiting room and talked for awhile. The story of the morning revolved around my sister. In her frenzy to pack and get to our house Monday night, she grabbed two black boots. The funny party is, she has two pairs of these black boots, and she mistakenly grabbed the right boot from each pair. And she wore them to the hospital. It was hysterical. My Dad wouldn’t let her live it down! It was pretty funny!
Sixth, that all the plain passages in the Greek Scriptures that clearly state that Jesus began ruling in the first century, such as Matthew 28:18: “All authority in heaven and on earth has been given to me…” don’t really mean what they say. Below is a more extended discussion of the implications of this assumption.
Thus here are some insights I have into blog writing, regardless of what it is you write.
Yeah... I do. It's wonderful, and scary, and such a different feeling having this man in my life who is so unselfish. So... it turns out I am high-maintenance after all. At least I am on occasion. Isn't everybody?
The Conference Board Consumer Confidence index fell to a 7 month low as the weak housing market, slow job recovery and the high prices of gas took their toll. I’m sure the European sovereign debt crisis which has brought the Greece riots to the front pages of newspapers and TV news hasn’t helped either.
And… It’s the beginning of a special tradition my wife and I share:
What do I do now - so much has changed
With a fist full of chicken leg, Hugo reveals he owns the place and the guy might have seen his commercial; he asks Des if he wants a Cluckateer key chain.
Not to say the job doesn’t cause me grief. Even pain sometimes, both physical and mental. But at least it’s a real job. At least I’m doing something that matters.
But the stratosphere wasn’t done yet. Not by a long shot. She’d started, so she was going to finish.
I think I took him by surprise. I didn't exactly apologize for anything. It was more of a fact telling moment for me. Apologies would come later but this conversation was significant because it was a wake up call for him. He saw my pain for the first time in months and realized how far away he had wandered in order to protect himself. He admitted that he was trying to "just get along" and not rock the boat too much. Other than that he didn't say much but the conversation ended with me in tears, the first real tears I had shed in front of him in many, many months. He held me, comforted me and he literally softened. It was like scales fell off his skin and he chose to start feeling and seeing me again.
Yesterday was Easter Sunday. Those of you who know even the slightest bit about me know that I’m about as religious as Christopher Hitchens.
But enough about interviewing other people. It’s time I interviewed YOU.
Huimin Jin, Chinese Academy of Social Sciences. Media as Relation and Relation as Truth: A Comparative Study of McLuhan and Confucius
We will be at the following spots near the times listed below. Punch cards will be passed out at Cuatro's. We will be punching cards throughout, its your responsibility to get it punched at each location, don't forget! We will be moving as a group according to the following schedule:
The earliest vehicles for his efforts were:
Shortly thereafter, Hurricane Reality hit the shoreline at the ex-agency and 16 people lost their jobs. My instinct was still intact apparently. Any fantasy I'd harbored of returning, or kicking myself for leaving in the first place, quickly evaporated. To be fair and honest, there is no such thing as the perfect job environment. When I would sit down and imagine everything I didn't like about the ex-agency, it suddenly made the current agency look pretty good. (Big perk: no electronic time sheets to fill out.)
1. The Ordinary Hero in his Ordinary World
Oh… and here is a note if you are in the Seattle area on March 2nd:
53. I like playing with corners. Even my close friends might squnit their eyebrows at this one!!
Adapted Screenplay: Alexander Payne, Nat Faxon, Jim Rash, The Descendants
So a lot of people get defensive when someone comes along and says, “Yeah, not so sure about that.” I totally understand that. So in that spirit, let’s try to start with some points on which I think everyone would agree:
You didn’t do it because “you can” that simply doesn’t wash, God, I know it doesn’t, and if you existed you’d be in total agreement.
What is the difference between these verses in Deuteronomy and the ones in Isaiah?
21. A perception that time is accelerating. It seems that way because you have had so many changes introduced into your life at an unprecedented rate. The number of changes seems to be growing.
Remember the old Motown song “What’s become of the Brokenhearted? We are reassured if our heart is broken; the Lord is close. He is holding your broken heart in His Hand.
I am heartbroken.
hopefully use that joy but fit it into a rock context.
I feel removed from riff and raff;
Smogs of variable intensity continued periodically in winter throughout my teenage years so I was exposed to them during my weeks at home for the Christmas holidays. One winter - I am not certain it was 1952 - I contracted a lung infection which led to a persistent cough and the stunting of my physical development. I stopped growing up and started growing round so that by the time I was eighteen I had a significant scoliosis and was well below the height appropriate for a healthy young man of my age. My nicknames at school became "shrimp" and "squirt" and I was the smallest in all the team photographs I have for that period. At home, when lounging around sprawled over couches and chairs as teenagers do, I was frequently admonished to sit up straight.
“We'll find new places. All our places are shit anyway.”
When he was still living in his homeland Lam Sơn, Lê Lợi caught a sword which he carried with him through his 10-year insurgence against the Ming. After overcoming the invaders, he became king and established the capital in Thăng Long (Hà Nội). One day he was relaxing in a boat on Lục Thủy Lake when suddenly a giant tortoise appeared. Lê Lợi took out his sword and moved toward the tortoise but it snatched the sword from him and dived into the water. He knew the sword still belonged to the god who lent it to him to fight against the enemy and, after the battle, the god asked him to return it. Lê Lợi believed the god sent the tortoise to reclaim the sword so he renamed the lake “Hoàn Kiếm”, which means “returning the sword”. According to one of the 8 steles kept in the Ngọc Sơn Temple, this site used to be a hill 3-4 sào in width, and was said to be the best place for angling in the Late Lê Dynasty.
We’re having an outdoor wedding, a barbecue reception, and it’s all at my parents home. The wedding is in the front yard and the reception will be in the back yard. So long dresses aren’t a smart idea. Thus began my research into bridesmaid dresses. So what did I come up with?
Hello my little sugar muffins!! Happy Thursday...hope you're having a great week! I've been busy trying to recover from my recent vacay!! I know you feel so sorry for me, right?! hehehe! I promise, though, I had umbrella drinks for each and every one of you! Deeelish!!
If any obviously discernable numbers of hookers are actually happy, well then, surely brothels are the places you could reasonably expect to find them? It’s just common sense, much like you’d find happy children in playgrounds, or happy drunks at parties, or happy gluttons at the all-you-can-eat.
I purchased the Skin Foundation SPF15 in Warm Beige 3.5, which gives a light-medium coverage and leaves a slight dewy finish...which I love. I don't like fully matte makeup.
Truth be told, the period of time between March 1st and right now has been the absolute worst for sales since I started with The Masks of Our Fathers last February. And I don’t think it’s a coincidence that I did basically no marketing for The Hollows (or any of my other books for that matter) in that time frame. Instead, I have been working on the next two Everything Theory books, the non-horror personal project, and mapping out a story that is now making me very afraid.
I worked in Prague in the mid-1990s, writing scripts for TV voice-overs to read in Czech – a neat trick, as I did not speak, write nor understand Czech. The scripts were translated into Czech and I then had to direct the recording of the Czech-language voice-overs – giving the TV announcers direction on intonation and suchlike – another neat trick.
it wise to go off with him? He’d never done anything to hurt her before. But he was still the rogue that regularly stole from her village and her friends and her family. But, here alone with him, she didn’t feel at risk at all. She felt quite safe, so she nodded, took his arm, and followed him deeper into the trees.
In the movie, Cage plays Doug, a secret service agent assigned to guard Tess, a cantankerous and stubborn widowed First Lady. After Doug rescues Tess from near death, she finds a new respect for him and he grows a backbone while she recuperates in the hospital. After Tess is discharged and is about to see the public again, an orderly asks her to sit in a wheelchair, citing hospital regulations for patients exiting the hospital. Tess disagrees on principle, not needing assistance and disliking regulations for their own sake. The two argue hotly until Doug whistles for their attention, looks at the orderly, and asks, “The regulations aren’t really that sacred, are they?” before turning back to Tess to say, “And Tess? Get in the goddamn chair.”
Making sure you get the cooking time right on these was crucial, too little and they'll be too runny, too much and they'll be just like cakes (not so bad) but if you want the perfect gooey brownie they need a carfeul watch. I checked mine for wobbl every 5 minutes or so after the first 15 mins of baking.
Below is a photo of the main supplies. I added a few more embellishments. To see an older post on how to make a larger version of these wreaths please click HERE. Instead of a larger foam wreath I glued these cones to a piece of book page 3" square and mad the point of the cones touch in the center. The cones are made of 3" squares too.
A level playing field.
The greatest troubadour in Iceland
Have you ever met a happy clam? If you have, just how happy was it? And how did you know it was happy? Was it smiling at you?
Well, we never walked anywhere. And it was just a couple of hours, not a day.
(somebody, anybody)
Under the supervision of CWOP’s Executive Director, the Network Coordinator will:
The tumultuous decade of revolution and counterrevolution in West Bengal (1967-77) ended with a relatively stable arrangement of class compromise presided over by a social democratic government. Over time the compromise, never perfect, decayed and collapsed under the crushing weight of sharpening contradictions – with social-democracy embracing the neo-liberal trajectory and the people responding with heightened resistance, the social-democratic dispensation lost the plot. Perhaps it had already outlived the role history had assigned for itself. In came the messiah of ma-mati-manush with an assortment of populist slogans.
Try to avoid excessive amounts of sodium (rampant in processed food & sodas) because it can cause you to retain water & raise your blood pressure (really bad). Water Bloat=Weight gain. Although table salt and naturally occuring salt in food is okay in moderation and table salt is NOT the enemy like some have made it out to be.
Include a link to his/her blog.
Whyte then did what other journalists have done in the past: made a video showing Natalie talking about her success, which has been extraordinary, to the point where she can make a living from doing what she has done - making funny videos - since 2006. Again, Natalie plays down her success, saying that the internet is
I started the process of cleaning out my old home office, and realized that I may not need every issue of Southern Living from 2003. . . I also realized that I’ve never met an issue of Better Homes & Gardens that I didn’t like, and that I need to re-subscribe to Traditional Living. And, hasn’t Country Living gotten so much better over the last couple of years?
Today's page features another vintage RX. I had this really cute photo of the little girl by the Christmas tree and I wanted to feature her. I loved the image so much I opted to keep this page really simple. I didn't want to detract from the photo. I added some number tiles that I think came from a Sudoku game and a little "Official use only" stamp at the top. There's actually a piece of vintage ledger paper that swings out from the back, which you can't see here that I added to journal on. But it looks kind of weird right now since it's blank.
No obsessing over how many days it has been since my last post.
No, no, let's be clear here. Fancy is not a smoker. That would make me stinky and wrinkly. I paid a lot for these sparkly teeth and I plan on keeping them. What I mean is that I am currently at the total and absolute mercy of the man who means the difference between getting any work done, putting on my make up or letting the Minis have their Elmo hour versus moving to a Fancy Hotel. Yes, that's right. My electrician is here.
"There's barely any media advertising these days for Nike," says Brian Collins, a brand consultant and longtime Madison Avenue creative executive.
Read this book recently. I do tend to read more children books these days, with having children of my own. Though to be honest I’ve always had a thing for children’s books – Winnie the Pooh, Wind in the Willows, Alice in Wonderland, to name a few.
There have been some great Rainforest’s in a bottle submitted as part of your home learning project. I know many of you still have plants growing at home too. This week’s home learning task is to develop an investigation which we started in class on Thursday with the Year 5s. I want you to investigate the Magic Vs problem - how can you make each ‘arm’ of the V add to the same total? If you have already completed this challenge, then why not take on the Magic Y investigation invented by Elliot, Archie and Louis.
Missouri Wrestling Revival is proud to announce that the Chase King is #71 is a member of the MWR Trading card set.
Dale and Thomas, where, oh where have you been all my life? These are soooooo good. Each and every one that we've tried is fresh and crunchy. Each one has a distinct flavor, so with 12 of them, you're pretty much guaranteed to find one you like. Even Alfie, who generally dislikes popcorn, is enjoying it! My favorite so far is the Black & White Biscotti -- somehow they actually managed to make it taste like chocolate-coated biscotti! Dale and Thomas is like the holy grail of gourmet popcorn!
One would think that, wouldn't one?
It’s an interesting tactic, which I might start doing with random strangers when I return to England.
Give a Joker Card, sometime can happen that the Life turns upside down.
Morning everyone Sara here with a new challenge for you , this week its the digi teams turn to play and I have chosen the theme favourite colour combo so lots of scope to get creative there .
During his last days in hiding Gaddafi read a lot, but did not fight, Daou recalls.
Nayuleska's reasons for loving Clary...I still adore her! This is as good as the 3rd book, maybe even a little bit better because she actually starts shadowhunter training. I'm so with her on the terrified of heights but the training pays off later in the book.
That's Stan. He's apparently 180 years old, and his wife, The Buzzard Queen, works the joint with him. She was there decked out in her black, sequined and feathered regalia, dirty dancing with strangers, taking dollar bills out of mens' waistbands with her teeth and posing for pictures. Classy couple, those two.
So I've made my resolution: I will be who I really am not matter what other people think of me. You have a problem with my quirks, my wit and witticisms, my outbursts, whatever. My response may differ externally out of courtesy , but my internal response is "Fuck You." Pure and simple. I need to put aside what people think of me and just live my life.
I placed a pair of urn lamps on either side of the settee...
"The stories reflect the disillusioned world of the 1920s in which they were written, and Conan Doyle can be seen to take advantage of new, more open conventions in fiction. Suicide as a murder weapon and homosexual incest are some of the psychological tragedies whose consequences are unravelled by the mind of Holmes before the eyes of Watson." The last book of short stories, and somewhat inferior to the best of the series, I think. But it is a long while since I read any others, and maybe they are all of this kind but have gained substance in my memory. I didn't notice any story containing homosexual incest either, but I'm not going back to find it. The book is also an 'Oxford World's Classics' edition complete with asterisks in the text leading to endnotes giving explanations and definitions which are annoyingly unnecessary for this reader - the meaning of the words 'cravat' and 'spats' could be found in any half-decent dictionary.
The morning sky has some of the redness left over from last night.
Yeah, I don't think they read that part (I'm starting to wonder if they've read any of the bible at all).
They're building a new shopping centre on the street where the cinema and Wigan casino used to be. It doesn't look to be any great shakes but hopefully it'll provide a different variety to the town's shops, maybe a decent book or record shop for example.
299 7. “Crisis and Continuity in the Clinton Presidency.” Public Interest Law Reporter, Loyola University of Chicago School of Law, July 1998, pp. 1-7. (Sources: Item D-II/27/1998, below, Item C-1998(5), above.)
"Oh my god! You can do that?" That was my initial reaction. If you could have seen the bruises and contusions I still bore from my then-distant school career, you can then begin to imagine how powerful this was for me to hear. To say that I hated school is probably a gross understatement. Loathed. Despised. Repulsed by. You get the idea. When I discovered back in the 8th grade that I could actually cut classes, this was another of my you-can-do-that? moments. I became an incorrigible class-cutter. And, I always got into trouble for it. Only thing was, I didn't exactly feel righteous about it! John Taylor Gatto and John Holt weren't household names back in the late 60s and early 70s, and nobody in the mainstream was impugning the merits of compulsory education. *I* knew there was something rotten here, but no one was giving me any quarter, me being considered to be an educational miscreant.
Where can we park? A parking guide will be sent home next week. A guide is also availabe on the Flying Pig Website.
I ran for thirty minutes earlier tonight and I fucking loved it. I'm training for deer season and I've started running, even bought gay-ass looking running shoes. Whaddaya know, apparently I enjoy running in circles at the USC track while zoning out and thinking about where to set up on Mark's property. So it goes. Thirty-eight and finally getting most things in order. Interesting.
I ran a pretty strong tempo on Tuesday, and nailed my goal paces, and felt strong. So....
The up close of the rods show what I mean about the odd sizing and why this solution worked. The elbows helped me mount one pipe right to the wall, and the dormer window pipe is mounted to the opposite walls adjacent to the window wall. So this method worked well, and the cost of the pipes and pieces was only $17. The clips were $2.99/pack, and the fabric was close to $50. So all in all, these were relatively inexpensive treatments, and I still have a yard of the fun fabric to use elsewhere!
Kaka had chances to wrap it up with 8 minutes of play remaining but was too hesitant. He overdid things and lost possession at crucial times and taking too long to release the ball.
The other pictures above are the three skirts I have made myself from one of my major pattern-crushes, Simplicity 2451 (pictured above). This is currently my strongest contender when I take part in the One week, One pattern challenge. What pattern do you think you would/will choose?
3. Simple Simon
Or, how about an more troubling thought?: What if the blue light of hope just didn’t work at all? I mean, to be driven to insanity, or villainy, or the deepest evil, one would have to be completely devoid of hope, right? They’d have lost the hope for a peaceful life, or turned their back on hope in favor of some other emotion? (Fear seems to be the inevitable opposite of hope.) In a recent issue of “Green Lantern: New Guardians”, Saint Walker attempts to use the blue light to quell the rage of of Invictus (whom I’m convinced is a white light being) to no avail – in fact, it does nothing but further anger Invictus into spilling his life story in true super-villain fashion. And even on those of a good heart the blue light doesn’t work – I remember when Saint Walker uses the blue light on the Blue Lantern founder Ganthet, in an attempt to relieve his grieving heart for the loss of his love, Sayd. All that did was make him more depressed (though now he is back to being an emotional void like the rest of the Guardians, I wonder if it would trouble him to see Sayd in her current state – being used as a surfboard by Larfleeze).
Again I nudged her with my foot. Sleepily, she awoke, cuddled snuggly in MY baby blanket. “What are you doing?!?” I asked, to which she responded by wrinkling up her face, eyes still half closed and said “why is it so HOT?!”
Guitarist, David Lee Roth, Whitesnake, Frank Zappa
What does unschooling do for you, the individual?
giving up guilt
My shake was YUMMMY this morning! The fruit was just perfect in it & blended nicely LOL That sounds dorky - but it really did!
Now it was all girly fun, where we could all dress up in our mothers’ fineries and prance around, inventing jobs for ourselves or just hang out together, gossip & look around coyly for good-looking boys.
Play along with Way Back When-esday!
Transport links - satisfactory as described above
I was first introduced to this recipe by Hilary of Crazy as a Loom (blog)...
You cannot predict the future.
will be selected via random.org. and announced on Wednesday, November 17th. If there are more than 25 entries for this challenge, I myself will choose a 2nd winner! They will receive also receive a prize and a blinkie to display on their blog/site.
287 9. “‘Racism,’ Political Correctness, and Constitutional Law: A Law School Case Study.” South Dakota Law Review, vol. 42, pp. 108-64 (1997). (Sources: Items D-XI/1/1995, D-XI/7(C))/1995, D-I/25/1996. D-II/6/1996, D-II/8/1996, D-III/6/1996, D-IV/1/1992, D-III/21/1996, D-XI/22/1976, D-III/28/1996, below, Item C-1994(8), above, and Items D-IV/15/1995, D-IV/1/1996, below.) See Items C-1998(11) and C -2001(4), below.
The other day I actually went to Barnes & Noble to work in the cafe because all I could think about was cooking and doing laundry sitting at my kitchen island.
The Court took the view that AdWords is an ‘information society service’. Moreover, AdWords fulfils the criterion of being a service limited to operating a communication network over which information is transmitted. Was AdWords ‘storage of information’ provided by the recipient of that service?
I’ll be sure to post this weekend once I am settled and have some food in my fridge.
"Umm..." I didn't know what to say but laugh my ass off.
Unofficial testing times
My appointment with her was great and just about everything that I hoped it would be. It wasn't that hard being in her office (the anticipation of being there was worse), although it helped that the door to the room that I had my last appointment with Jacob was closed so I didn't have to look in there (I have to walk by it to get to the scale). I also peed on the stick to measure protein, which I haven't done for 20 months.
So get this my darlings, as you may know in the past year I have raved about two blow dryers and the outstanding way they perform. So one day while minding my own business I opened my closet of goodies (hair products) and guess who was staring at me? You guessed right, the two dryers that I wrote about. So as usual the hair dryers and I started to conversate (says Beyonce). They were tired of both being in my closet and wanted to come out (every boys dream). So I decided that the only way to freedom was to compete, a heated death match!
The photo of the right is an old postcard which I kept because the two people sitting near the Bridge House are myself and my friend and I think it was taken in the early 60’s. As the house is probably the most photographed place in Ambleside, we probably didn’t even realise at the time that we were being photographed, let alone that we were going to appear on a postcard! Artistic licence has changed the colours of our jackets to look like the modern, brightly coloured kagools.
1 lb sausage (we used a mild Italian, not in the casing)
Warned of a magical “bomb” at a local elementary school, Celia forces an evacuation. Oddly, the explosion seems to have no effect, puzzling both Celia and the FBI. Two weeks later, a strangely persistent bruise on Celia’s leg turns out to be the first sign of a magical zombie plague.
Not to fear, I’m back, I’m still alive, still crazy, still making music, art, and video games, still me. How have I been? Pretty good I suppose. Not too rough. Just spent some time with a couple friends yesterday. Went to Spirit House and Meditated. It was very very nice. I haven’t felt that peaceful in awhile. To feel that way in such a dark and claustrophobic atmosphere, I’m not sure how it was possible. I felt rejuvenated though. Completely let go of thinking, which I haven’t been able to do in a couple years. Yesterday was the first time my meditations have worked in a long time. It was very nice to have them back. I was also given a sign that I am not alone and I’m being watched over and protected. It’s nice to know that.
While Burton provides us with enough offbeat humor to satisfy, the constant filtering in-and-out of supporting characters often times left me wanting more. That’s not to say you forget about the characters, but there are long periods of time where we go without seeing them.
What we love...
Ingredients – 1 pint of cream, 4 ozs of pistachio nuts, 2 ozs of castor sugar, 1 oz of leaf gelatine, a little sap-green liquid colouring.
The officer closed the door with a sharp clang. Olivia tried not to stare at the other inmate. She was a large woman with close-cropped hair and faded monochrome tattoos. Olivia could make out the name Wendy tattooed on the girl’s forearm. Oh My God, she thought. I would hate to be her cellmate.
For those of my readers too young to remember the joys of the Carter years, you are getting an unfortunate treat. As for the nation of Russia, the return of Putin all but guarantees a despotic realm where intimidation from a police state now equipped with the best Western technology has to offer shall befall the citizens.
Numerous bear experts have already submitted statements to the USDA in opposition to renewing Jambbas’ license. After spending several hours observing Ben, bear expert Else Poulsen noted that Ben “is suffering greatly and intervention is critical at this time.” Other animals being exhibited at Jambbas, including goats, cows, pigs, rabbits, sheep, bison, elk, deer, dogs, and others, are kept in inhumane conditions and have been documented suffering from untreated veterinary ailments and engaging in abnormal behaviors indicative of psychological anguish.
Are contests a good use of my time and lint-covered quarters? Does anyone ever really win? Do new writers ever have a chance? As with everything, it depends on what you’re after and how many quarters you can scrounge. To win takes lots and lots of patience.
Here it is!
Last night was interesting for me.
What does it mean to be scientific? Why do we say that some things are scientific, and others are not? The traditional definition is that a scientific hypothesis must be falsifiable, meaning that it must be testable, subject to disproof via investigation.
1. Frizz-Ease Mousse: I love this mousse for when I want a more defined wave to my hair. Scrunches like NONE OTHER. My go-to curly hair product and has been for 5+ years now.
Michael Ondaatje’s The English Patient
It has no windows, and the door swings, 390
Regardless of where the individual comes from we need someone with solid CEO type skills. Critical would be strong communication skills; the ability to think logically and create a vision for the organization; the ability to develop practical applications for their ideas and theories; and of course the ability to effectively work with and lead others in the realization of that vision.
I never ever want to be a gossip columnist, but I would love to be a feature writer. The kind of writer that details the daily life of a person or a place so vividly, that you can't help but think, "I know this person", or "I've been there".
She woke up and said, “MOMMY, WHAT’S THIS?!” She was so excited. I really wish I had it on video because the images just don’t do it justice. I also snuck in one of the cupcakes that we bought for her daycare class. A child should never be without cake on her birthday!
Rutger Hauer Also Says He’s Not Likely To Reprise His Role
Patricia F. DiChiaro, 63, New York, N.Y.
The OB called me back and told me to call my OB's office in the morning. She said that they rarely see miscarriages with signs like that one at this point in a pregnancy. But to get an ultrasound to at least "put my mind at ease."
HOME OR THEATER: This is going to seem sacrilegious, but I think it’s going to look just as great at home as it does in a movie theater.
Be warned- No photos! In our rush to leave the house, I forgot my camera! I dry rubbed the ribs(minus membrane)and baked the ribs in the oven, in an aluminum pan- covered with aluminum foil at 300F for 3-1/2 hrs. Then I used a home made finishing sauce for another 40 minutes, uncovered..these were falling off the bone tender and full of flavor! None came home!
I'm writing this seething stuck in my seat back from LA. Holding for a landing spot for 15mins.
I am amused how death like a desirous lover shadows me each night relentlessly. Sometime lurking among the deep dark crevices of my mind at others trailing me from a safe distance. I feel it presence. Gentle , persevering she stays close. She ? Yes I know night with all its beauty and glorious charm can only be feminine.
I told her that if she needed me any other time over the weekend, to please seek me out. Even if it was just to get a hug from someone who "knows."
(FYI - after taking the item out of the water - I rinsed it under cool water until the water ran clean)
Nebuchadnezzar tested his counselors by pretending to forget his dream. This was somewhat of a double test: Could they tell him what the dream had been, and could they then tell him a believable interpretation of it? If we suppose that Satan was behind this scheme, then it is important to note that he was willing to kill all his false prophets just to get rid of four righteous servants of God.
My son had his party at school today. I got to go for a little while, and it was so cute. The class made a book for him about why they thought he was important. Each kid drew a picture and wrote a sentence about how Tyler was important to them. He got to sit at the front of the class, and each kid came up to read their page to him. He was so excited to be the center of attention! Of course he wanted to bring in special treats for his party, so I made these cupcakes. He wanted them to have the "toys" that the store bought cupcakes had, but he was adamant that I make them (as if I didn't have enough to do). In walks store bought cake mix! I did make the frosting though.
Margot Bergman Wonderland & Other Reveries
Quite honestly, my eight year old son has a far greater flair for PR.
Anyway, I was looking at all these Crafty ladies milling about the Kings Hall and all the while I was wondering did I know any of them from Blogland. It was really starting to bug me and at one stage I really wanted to shout out at the top of my lungs "Oi YOU LOT........I'M CRAFTY LOOPS IN BLOGLAND. DO ANY OF YOU KNOW ME OR DO I KNOW YOU?" And as much as I would have loved to have done that, I would have run the risk of Tara and Maddy grabbing their bags (with T probably grabbing my purse in the process!) and then swiftly running off down one of the crowded aisles in an attempt to ditch me!! So I didnt shout anything, which was me totally fighting against my nature.....believe me!
A year later, he was appointed senator representing Penang, giving him the distinction of being the first DAP senator.
This is a submarine museum similar to those you would find in most ports in the US. The original Russian submarine was purchased by Indonesia in 1962 and it was used during the campaign to force the Dutch out of the Irian Jaya. The submarine is kept in surprisingly good condition and it even has working AC. For 5,000 rupiahs per adult you have access to the submarine itself, a small museum and a short film about the history of the submarine. The submarine is quite large compared to others we’ve been in and Evan loved looking at the hatches and lying in the beds. The place was empty when we got there so we were able to stay in each of the areas of the submarine for as long as we wanted. We didn’t really go inside the museum or watch the film but I think Evan was really impressed by the size of the submarine and he kept yelling “big boat” as he was pointing at it. The tour took about half an hour at the most, since we were looking at every switch and room, but you could probably check it out in less than 10 minutes. In any case, I do think it’s worth visiting and for less than 1 USD, why not?
The sun was beginning to go down when we got back to shore so we wasted no time cycling back to the hotel while the bright red sun set over the distant mountains, beautiful.
OMG why is this so hard…. I mean, not only is it hard but I don’t help myself! Right now I’mm really having a bad time with my eating habits. I just say ok I’ll have this and afterwards I think “Oh, well… I already messed up so I can eat something else again!” And that is SOOOOO WRONG!!!! Eating a chocolate once can actually be ok, but letting go and eating more and more is not ok.
Are you an IP litigator in search of something to read? Have you any personal experience of the CIPA Higher Courts Qualification Regulations or the ITMA Trade Mark Litigator and Trade Mark Advocate Certificate Regulations that you're bursting to share? If so, the Intellectual Property Regulation Board (IPReg) Consultation on Replacement of the CIPA Higher Courts Qualification Regulations and the ITMA Trade Mark Litigator and Trade Mark Advocate Certificate Regulations may be just what you're looking for.
Gotrek and Felix
4 Fareed Zakaria writing in Khaleej Times that America is the most dynamic society in the developed world. While Japan has entered and Italy and Germany are approaching a demographic death spiral, the US remains young, vibrant and active. Demographics is not destiny, but it helps mightily to have a growing society, with a healthy share of young workers — who are also taxpayers. US still attracts the most immigrants and most investment in the world.
And I must acknowledge
The trip to Oklahoma City was an absolutely amazing experience from start to finish. It was a healthy balance of culture-shock and absolute reverence for such a beautiful city.
WHERE: n/a
April 2, 2012. Today is World Autism Awareness Day.
I wanted to try Rub 'n Buff but it was hard to come by in Ottawa, and I also worried about it continuing to rub and buff off onto surfaces (anyone have experience with this material?), so I thought I'd try some leftover spray paint instead. As a bonus, I had dribs and drabs of various paints so this makeover was cheap-cheap-cheap.
The Poison Sky
Entrepreneurship Center Manager
Keep ya posted and happy trading
In “Memories Of Madison — My Life In The New Left” MacDonald continues his grand project of assembling true facts or experiences, and then illuminating them with a jaundiced light. To start, he repeatedly takes universal phenomena or traits common to all people, or to a social or occupational class, and ascribes them to Jews, as Jews. He writes, for instance, of the “tendency for Jewish intellectual movements to become centered around highly charismatic Jewish figures,” as if there were non-Jewish intellectual movements not so centered, whoever the charismatic figure.
Keys to the Kingdom
Once they splutter,add the chopped onion and ginger and garlic pastes ans saute for sometime...
well, that was fun. 18 days out of 31 isn't bad when you're chasing a toddler around... i'd prefer warmer weather for this though- my legs nearly froze!!
Personally, I'm kinda looking forward to Boxing Day, too. Any excuse to celebrate works for me. ;)
Your Pregnancy: Week 17
The spirit of festivals has declined too one could suggest, popstars who do not play instruments and rely on electronics to perform win the heart of the masses who have seen the old five-piece rock band routine all too many times.
Do you have a favorite recipe from a book you’ve read?
Mofaz made a fool out of himself when he jumped ship to Kadima, but after sitting it out on the back benches behind Tzipi Livni on the back benched, he’s manages to come out on top and resuscitate the essentially dead Kadima party.
Make like a superhero
Mark your calendars for our " HOLLY JOLLY" FABRIC SALE!! Christmas fabric on the bolt will be on sale Dec 14th - Dec 23th. Christmas fabric will be 40% OFF with a minimum purchase of 1 yard cut per bolt. While fabric lasts!!
Shoes: Gabriella Rocha
This long name has a variety of meanings…
Last weekend was jam-packed; following the Red Tails screening and an appearance at Barrett Jackson on Friday, my Sweetie and I headed to Tucson for Dillinger Days on Saturday. Our good friends invited us to meet them at the Congress Hotel for the festivities—we arrived around noon and enjoyed the nice turnout of vintage cars, which, along with the period music and backdrop of the historic Congress Hotel and train station, lent a lovely atmosphere to the event. Our outfits were a smashing success—I wore a late 1930s gold and black rayon/linen dress accented with looping rickrack trim, paired with 40s platforms and a deco handbag, and my friends wore a 1940s rust print dress and a cream 40s dress with coordinating accessories—and we were immediately asked to pose for pictures by other attendees and car owners.
Some may even believe that mass third world immigration is a good thing and greet it with pompom waving enthusiasm in the way that only an ideological fanatic or one who is not forced live with its results can do. Some welcome it because they profit handsomely from it but they are a small cynical minority, The other 90% would rather not take a stand on a subject like immigration for the single reason that like most of Britain they have been cowed into obedience by the “R” word. They were conned into believing that talk of “Immigration” made the Tories the “nasty party”, a devastatingly clever trick which still effects Tory party thinking today.
Ok so some of the supplies used on my tag are still Stampin Up... papers and punches etc... but the new supplies that I used were gorgeous Wendy Vicchi (have I spelt that correctly? ) stamps, love the quote... and if you squint at the flower you'll see that theres a background stamp on there. I stamped the leaf stamp onto some grunge paper (first time I've tried grunge paper and I do like it... was nice to curl the leaves without the normal cracking you get from paper and card... see flower LOL
Features which distinguish a book from a bookLET:
We lean upon this graveyard stone,
"Paul!" I felt my body shake "Paul, I can't get on an aeroplane now...look!"
my chicken before it has hatched.
They're really cheap too. I got them @ Michaels for $0.59
Listening -- 20 minutes
This go around, I have to give all the credit to Ryan. She suggested I try Match this time. And we had a long talk about broadening my horizons when it comes to race. And I’m glad she was willing to be real with me & really make me think about WHY, I had made the selections I did. She certainly wasn’t trying to talk me into or out of, dating a certain race, but just wanted me to have convictions and know why I checked the box, that I checked. I broadened my options & have had A LOT more communication because of it. And for that I am grateful.
She doesn’t even get the name out before the crowd descends into the most hate-filled, family unfriendly chant known to mainstream professional wrestling. Loud, despite the more mellow feel of the song, A Star U R from the same producer as above begins to play loudly. The video graphics on the possibly stolen Titantron above the ramp show the challenger from the night before dancing and… preaching? Yes, possibly preaching to the masses of the world, as he stands on the world with a gun on his back and a beautiful woman on either side of him in clothing that extenuates their ample cleavage. It’s a terrible sight. And it only gets worse.
Mom and Grandma hit the road on Sunday and my little brother showed up the very next day. Actually, younger brother would probably be a better way of saying that, given the fact that he is well over 6 feet tall and towers over his 5 foot 9 inch older sis.
A lot of good writers also have a passion for reading. Once you get a job, it is easy to come home at 6 p.m. and not want to look at another word. You will be missing out on a lot if you let this happen. As a PR professional, it is also necessary to stay caught-up on current events, whether you are reading a newspaper or magazine, or accessing news online. It doesn’t matter if you are reading for fun or to gather information—just read.
Mace??
I've bought less books; in part due to no longer working at Oxfam so I'm less tempted. Instead I've read what I've already got. Don't we all have things on the bookshelf that we've barely had time to skim through before the next book is bought? In general without the temptation of a weekly visit to town now I'm not working there, I've spent less. I've no need to buy myself a sandwich for lunch for example which I use to treat myself to periodically.
Director : Bob Clark
My boys are handling the crazy well so far. Collin already has a (girl)friend from the school he’s hoping to attend (Thanks, Facebook). This school currently has the #1 ranked baseball program in the country. Collin’s current coach has already volunteered to send an email to the new coach saying all sorts of positive things and Collin and Ty are already scoping out batting facilities, practice fields and select teams. If any of you have insight, please help us out. The only sticky widget is that the school’s area seems to be a nice one. Fingers crossed that we can find an affordable apartment/extended stay hotel in that area. Camden is just ready to go. Ready to make new friends, build robots and maybe learn a thing or two about Imagineering.
Be sure to check back for new recipes and final photos!!
Tight diamond necklace
So THIS is fun! Especially for those of you who are planning black and white themed affairs, I thought this new Lacy Tape from Rockett St. George would make a nice addition to favor boxes, just to dress things up a bit. Don't you think?
That greatest of the great tolerated my horribly familiar attitude.
･Nexus One
Topps Chrome is one of the new releases I enjoyed a lot in 2011. I originally began the set by chasing favorite players and players on favorite teams, but eventually I found that I was well on my way to collecting this set - especially since I'm not worries about completing all of the various parallels.
angry like a tempest in the ocean.
- Nina by Nina Ricci
…not true in this case. While this episode is clearly a Robin episode through and through, the episode also gives just as much attention to the team as a whole, showing the amount of camaraderie they’ve built up after the number of missions and drama they’ve gone through. Each of them really cares for each other and has each other’s back not just in a teammate sense, but in a family sense… which is especially brought home by the fact that the team is undercover as a family.
A lot! Sloane begins to receive cyber threats. While Sloane uses her computer forensic skills to uncover the source of the threats, it is discovered someone is out to kill her. Can her life get more crazy?
After completing his Form Five education, Ang had no choice but to start working, as his parents could not afford to finance his education any further. To help support the family, Ang started driving his father’s taxi to earn a living.
Anyway, the story goes that I heard Bubbles bark, went down to see what was going on and realised I'd been robbed. The back door was open and my bilum was missing. I didn't notice the knife block until later.
Before Christmas, @MaryLD showed us a clever technique for making blocks based on triangles. One of the trickier areas of piecing is if fabric is cut on the bias since it has a tendency to stretch and distort. This can make working with triangles a PITA.
Now, watching a master barber from the Subcontinent go to work on a regular hirsute Saudi customer -- often in the late evening after prayer -- can be an excrutiating exercise in patience. He can easily spend 10 or 15 minutes after the main haircut making such ultra-fine clipping movements and razor cuts on his customer that you'd think he was giving a performance at the Met.
beds in amazing, space-saving bags.
I would play the priest and my cousins would be the churchgoers. My cousins would arrange themselves as though they were in pews. I would walk down the aisle carrying the cross, and sprinkling my cousins with “holy water.” My cousins would be holding their palm leaves waving them up and down. When I reach the “altar,” they would line up, and I would say “the body of Christ” and they would say “Amen” and I’d give them haw flakes.
To be fair, I've been having a rest from it for a few months now, with the occasional post. But, the truth is, I'm forgetting to blog.
The question for the SNP is not whether we can join NATO as a non nuclear hosting country, which has smacks of the old aiding and abetting charge about it, the question should simply be how soon are we going to lead the world by abolishing all nuclear weapons from our own country.
In response to Mr. Obama, Mr. Boehner said: “The sad truth is that the president wanted a blank check six months ago, and he wants a blank check today. That is just not going to happen.”
And now for gratuitous shots of Josh the Wonder Pony who will be down at U of I for the remainder of the week until we can figure out what the heck is going on in that eye.
So there is 10 and I didn't even mention baseball, gardening, sandals, baby animals (REALLY have enjoyed seeing the calves this year) or any of the other wonderful things that warmer weather brings :)
That’s because the Vita is able to hold even a game like Uncharted: Golden Abyss in stasis while you return to the Vita menus and change some settings etc. As soon as you want to return to the game, it resumes instantaneously, even if you put the console to sleep and leave it alone for 48 hours.
Remember; spend some time with your loved ones, because they are not going to be around forever.
Earlier last week, the NFL released the official schedule of all 32 teams for the 2012 season. Here is a look at what the Detroit Lions are up against, as well as “key games” for the 2012 season:
Marxism and Cosmopolitanism
be allowed to tread its native fields,
Oh yeah, happy April Fool's Day too. I've never been big on the fooling, because really, the awesomeness of my birthday usually consumes my day. It's no different this year.
1 ½ cups, (6 oz.) shredded mozzarella cheese
We always had grand plans for stopping along I-95 & I-75 to see some attractions, such as the Weeki Wachee mermaids. But as the hours and miles ticked by (and it seemed more & more cramped inside my little 2-door Chevy Cavalier) my dad would inevitably get too impatient to make any side trips.
All locally grown or made in Lancaster County, PA:
It turns out that I can write 50,000 words in a month. I ended up writing all 50,000 in one week! I also managed to keep our family functioning and finish one blog post. And while I didn't make a big deal of it to the girls, part of me really wanted to throw a party for myself when I hit 50,000 words on day seven. This week I'm exhausted, which isn't at all surprising. Having completed my goal, my word count is now a non-issue in our house as the girls continue their writing adventure. I'm working on my first rewrite at a more leisurely pace. And my mind is already considering trying the same process for a nonfiction book in a month or two.
We picked up our rental car with relative ease and headed to Kilkenny for our first night. Jim drove. Yikes, Jim drove. Jim drove on the wrong side of the road while sitting on the wrong side of the car. And drove a stick shift. Jim drove a stick shift with his left hand. Oy, what an adventure. Jeff was fine. Jim was fine.
A beautiful sunset to end the day.
And this is where the true irony of Sessions’ piece begins.
And the pressures of parenthood weren't alleviated by nannies and other servants when it came time to go to a Republican ladies luncheon so you could glorify the destruction your husband wrought on real working class families and badmouth liberals and how poverty is a "mental disease", as Neil Boortz recently put it.
You’ll get mixed up, of course, as you already know. You’ll get mixed up with many strange birds as you go. So be sure when you step. Step with care and great tact and remember that Life’s a Great Balancing Act. Just never forget to be dexterous and deft. And never mix up your right foot with your left.
Ideally, I would like to see a list of Bookforce’s clients, specifically overseas affiliates, but I can only find client connections to the company's own publishing imprints; Discovered Authors, DA Diamonds and Four O’Clock Press (and also now Callio Press - 2010). The BookForce website could also do with a great deal more transparency and far less broken links.
For Foucault this was the cornerstone of the medical institutions capacity to “affect embodiment” via the use of the “legitimation of social institutions ability to pronounce on the truth of their field of knowledge” (Cregan, 2006 :41). The body therefore began to be regulated and controlled medically as a form of social control. The medical fraternity at that time, with no immediate or alternative source of competition, set its own terms, proclaimed it’s own correctness and continued to manipulate the embodied experiences of those deemed, by the same medical establishment, to be ‘abnormal” (Cregan, 2006:41). As such bodies can be seen to come under medical control due to the prolonged and uncontested definitional power of the medical establishment to define the behaviour of people as either normal or abnormal (Cregan, 2006: 41).
Now I have this incredible autumnal looking yarn to work with. I left half of the yarn undyed so I could make something that was striped. I’m thinking maybe a striped Oatmeal? I don’t know, any knitters have any pattern/design suggestions?
FIRST THEY TOOK HIS DAUGHTER. NOW THEY'VE COME BACK FOR HIM.
As soon as you close the cover on the Epilogue Moby Dick almost screams to be reread; I hope one day I’ll heed the call. Not only for those first hundred or so pages I slogged through, unappreciating: All of it bespeaks a sublety and depth unattainable in the first read.
And I am suffering.
the table, it isn’t cute. It just means Americans
Organised criminality from China is now apparent at 7KM market. Particularly so with massive illegal currency exchange at a market that works strictly with cash, turns over $millions in a day. It is not in your face, you do need to know who’s who and what’s what, but it is there and it is Chinese run (at least at the coal face) and we are talking about a lot of money.
A voice composed in arias.
Hey everyone! Between laundry & some house cleaning chores, I've been doing lots of photo editing today, & I'm tired! I get impatient with this kind of thing and just want to be finished. Are any of you like that? Come on, be honest! Anyway, I've tried to do photo collages as much as possible, just so it seems like there are fewer pictures, but this will be long anyway. So grab something cool to drink & settle in. I hope you enjoy!
It started with a tweet. Then, suddenly!, a whole flock of us were twittering on about tackling our stash of lace-weight yarns and what lace patterns we might try. There were so many of us, the names took up most of the 140 characters available. This was a bit of fun… for about three tweets or so; and then we decided to get real. So, taking a leaf out of @WrapNTurn’s book for organising Knitmas, I set up a separate twitter account: @lacealong2012.
I have been praying The Prayer of Jabez for years, that God would bless me indeed and enlarge my territory, that God would keep His hand on me and keep me from evil that I might not cause pain. I don’t believe this prayer has been in vain, because my website has now reached 20, 000 views, and God has hopefully increased my sphere of influence with the publishing of my book. I have certainly been blessed, and my territory has certainly been enlarged more than I ever thought possible. God has kept His strong hand of mercy on me throughout my life and has certainly kept me from doing evil on several occasions though in my humanness, I certainly wanted to. If you have not read the classic book “The Prayer of Jabez, I highly recommend it as it is one of the best books I’ve read and its premise was one of the great spiritual steppingstones in my life.
He'd been placing jackets and suits into a big carrier bag. They all had Italian logos on them.
They are two very personal LPs and probably too melancholic and introspective for openly belonging to some tipical 70s american singer-songwriter. They have a great sense of melody and some sort of slow passion. Also, Tom Parker's orchestrations give them a special warmth. In "Spilt Milk" we can find de immediate feeling of "Beat The Reaper", the amplitude of "Five Leaves Left" (not the one of Nick Drake), the vaudeville of the charming "Pigeons", or the colour of "Inside You". In "Colorado Kid" we find "You Are My Inspiration", the song Carole King never wrote, and dwelling also there there's the magnitude of "Heavenly Band", the intimacy of "You Can Fly Me To The Moon" (echoes of Laura Nyro on that chorus...), or the greatness of "You Be The Tide, I'll Be The Bay" (with the floating psychedelic sitar of Mal Luker, ex - The Smoke).
One of them stopped me, as I was wandering from the Woodlands Mall toward the area of fantasy housing neat Lake Woodlands. Where was I going? There was an initial touch of suspicion, possibly by the fact that I'd stopped at the roadside and clearly tossed a mental coin as to direction. A true Texan would of course be in a car. Or a huge truck.
Mr James had a ten-hour operation to insert the wafer-thin microchip in the back of his left eye at the Oxford University Eye Hospital six weeks ago. Three weeks later, it was turned on.
Knowing how important the tea trade is to the British East India Company, they had to find a solution. They knew tea was grown in northeast India but no one knows how to grow it commercially other than the tea masters in China. The problem was, all Chinese ports were closed to foreigners except Canton and they can only stay within a special designated area. This presented much challenge for this British to learn about tea growing.
JO: We didn't realise what we were doing until we came home.
If your weight is 130 pounds: 130 x 0.45 = 58.5. Your weight in kilograms is 58.5.
Half of Henrick’s life has gone – pfft! – and the final leg is not shaping up the way he might have hoped. He’s not simply being a doom monger though. His fears are grounded in the real world. He looks at his parents’ marriage and shudders:
Unfortunately, there seems to be a major disconnect between the importance of landing pages and their use by marketers. According to MarketingSherpa’s Landing Page Handbook (2nd edition), 44% of clicks for B2B companies are directed to the business’ homepage, not a special landing page. Furthermore, of the B2B companies that are using landing pages,62% have six or fewer total landing pages.
6. The magnetism of character.
You’ve gotta dance like there’s nobody watching, Love like you’ll never be hurt, Sing like there’s nobody listening, And live like it’s heaven on earth.” ― William W. Purkey
1/2 cup finely chopped shallots
Jesus’ point was that this woman had been looking for life to the fullest extent in her relationship with men. Social and religious restrictions had made that the only possible outcome for her life. But there was no hope for life to the fullest extent as long as she limited her potential in that way. In John 4:13-14, Jesus made a rather large claim regarding his offer:
Jerry Lee Lewis: Forever Forgiving
Chris, if you are reading...I love you so much & am so thankful for you :) I can't wait to spend the rest of my life with you. Happy Valentines Day!!! xoxoxo
SMS: Looking back at the 2011 sewing scene, what trends stand out in your mind?
This is depressing and elating at once.
I did a studio Waltz today, meaning I picked up the brushes and moved the paint around after a month away from painting. The dance felt like I had to remember where to put my feet and how to move once again. My camera is still packed so you are seeing an iPhone photo of this Texas Longhorn cow painting of Ruby. I see changes and a need for a better photo but I wanted to touch base and get back to posting. I am taking one step at a time and that includes making today,
And so, for many years (not giving a lot of thought to Ravel or his Bolero) I disliked it.
The title proved to be a big hit and soon Marvel published the Fantastic Four. Sometime afterward, Stan Lee and Jack Kirby unveiled another team of heroes called “The Avengers.” The tag-line from their first adventure summed up perfectly what was happening:
The few who did take up the offer weren’t enough to cover the costs of going, and the majority of them wanted a good headshot rather than their tattoos photographed. Across the weekend I had more photographers stopping by for a chat than I did customers wanting a photo.
Drat! And I was doing so well…for the first two days. Ok, so I’m behind on the Blog Me MAYbe challenge. I might have forgotten to blog more days than I remembered…oops?
1) healthy individuals may have good and bad parts of their personalities, but they don’t have a Jekyll and Hyde personality; a mask of sanity that hides an essentially malicious and destructive self. In a healthy relationship, there’s a certain transparency: basically, what you see is what you get. People are what they seem to be, flaws and all.
Family and friends say Mbatsha, a father of one, had admitted to being involved in a fight a few weeks ago during which he shot two men, injuring them both.
Got the folding hampers for my son for when he brings his clothes home to wash.I paid $17.64 not to bad I think and also left with $8.00 in register rewards from the razors.Nice coupon in today's paper $5.00 off.
As you’d think the dish would be done as it goes in the oven, wait, there’s more work yet! It’s time to brown-braise onions and brown the mushrooms.
No worries....more ideas and activities to come. For now though, have a FUN summer!!
Fennel seeds - 1 tsp
My mom has started to stockpile boxes of the mix from HEB's in Houston (...no HEB's in Dallas... there is one 35 minutes south on I-45...) for me, but that's just not going to work for a cake before Friday! I have found a few recipes online that MIGHT work, but we're talking making them from scratch. Come on, I work full time.
The said right implies, among many other things, the judicious management and conservation of the country’s forests.
* Inability to view the world from the perspective of other
"Firstly, on the main part of your blog, it's nearly always upbeat and often funny, and this creates the impression you're always fully on top of things."
Why Cycle
I realize that this is just a phase and that I will somehow get through it and I will be able to get through it. It just seems that when I get home from work, I can't get myself to read. Now part of this is due to the fact that I was watching all of season 1 of Game of Thrones on Tuesday and Wednesday and just came off of Season 2 of Downton Abbey the previous week, but I feel little or no motivation to do any reading at all. Of course I have a bunch of books available not only on my e-reader but also in paper format, but I just don't feel the need to read anything. Any idea how to get out of this funk? I did a previous post on this or I have seen posts on this topic and I can't seem to find anything that would help or I just can't recall where I have seen such a post.
Oh, thank God. Nirvana. Smells Like Teen Spirit.
It breaks my heart when someone wasted his life, but I do not have high expectations, only hopes. I see fairly clearly, I do not expect miracles, but still hope and do what I can. I know we can not save them all, but it does not stop us from trying. I write my life in the hope that some of the things I have learned may help someone else to traverse the same treacherous spots.
It's been a while since I've played along. But it is always fun to see what other readers write about. So get on over and check out Ni Hao Y'all!
Wedding rings on or off? on - so surprised I don't have swollen fingers/toes yet. Although I have some real sausages to begin with, so I'm not sure how much worse they can get.
Pub Date: 1 September 2011
There was an ear-shattering crack.
Nome do Lab: Online Backup Service for Windows Server “8″
1 ooooh
JBS-Swift Beef Co based in Greeley, Colorado, is expanding its June 24 recall to a total of about 421,000 lbs of assorted beef products, USDA and the company said.
2) Meaning & Careers & Identity (reflection & wisdom)
Meet pummpkin Pie, a New Orleans mule who spends her days pulling carriages filled with tourists through the streets of the French Quarter. She nudged me twice as I stood taking a picture of Jackson Square, so I assumed she wanted her picture taken too. Rather photogenic, don't you think?
His face was bloodied, and his nose swelled up right away. It took a while to find his glasses too. They really flew far. By the end of the day, he had a black eye. Poor guy. It's dangerous out here!
The corporations that do business in an array of areas should be made to have one consistent security policy so that people like ME who happen to drive to a variety of their locations don't notice the discriminatory inconsistencies and call them out.
So 7 things...
The real question here is why would anyone want to put something into my food that is not natural?
Together we breathe
Since I am on the subject of badass journalists (Nazaryan, Max), I might as well direct your attention to the (aforementioned) John Jeremiah Sullivan’s review of The Pale King.
Scientists from the University of California, Los Angeles and the Veterans Administration say they "stumbled" upon a possible cure for baldness while researching how stress affects the stomach and gut.
Another mineral contained in the Dead Sea is sulphur, a key component of acid rain, and you've probably seen what that does to statues.
Here is my birthday wish for you. I know that you have huge stores of strength and love for whatever life throws at you. I wish for you that this year be a year of storing strength rather than needing it, of hoarding love and happiness, of stockpiling fun and great health. Thank you for the friendship you have given me so freely despite having never met!
I thought, if every person everywhere sang like John we would hear the mighty song of all God’s people!
Wasn’t that a waste of public money?
This is a Slow, Creeping Destruction that is gaining momentum. The Marxist Regime is
Welcome, a glorious day here in Adelaide, perfect for getting the washing dry, going to the Beach - daughter Emma and visiting Shirley for a crafting session! Doug had already been for a ride before it got too hot, so was ready for a snooze and Shirley worked on a new card whilst I made up the workshop cards and we nattered away - the time flies. Some lovely slice with a cup of tea before I headed home to do a little more tidying up. I hope wherever you are that your weekend has been great too.
“Oh my God, I’m dead,” Jack said to himself when he was finally able to focus his eyes on his immediate surroundings. The mosquito netting hanging down from the ceiling and surrounding his bed had created a surreal, milky hue to the world making it seem unearthly. Adding to the effect was the megaton-sized banging in his head and that the rest of his body refused any command to move Jack momentarily pondered an afterlife condemned to haunting a cheap queen-sized mattress.
Following the White House’s comical staged hoax of SEAL Team 6′s gallant raid on long-dead Osama bin Laden, and with no evidence to show it actually happened other than President Obama’s TV speeches- we get the next public assassination. After all, Obama’s far-fetched tale of the bin-Laden mission somehow vindicated all those innocent lives ruined by US incarceration and outright torture of thousands of young men since the War on Terror officially began in 2001.
Eating steak frites
1 ½ tsp ground black pepper
These statistics show…that work/life balance is an important…and costly issue for both the organization…and the individual…
Turn-of-the-century Australia holds one of the world’s most magnificent settings for this first book in the new Australian Destiny Series. Responding to an offer of indenture, Samantha Connolly and her sisters have attempted to escape a bleak future in Ireland by immigrating to Queensland. Circling half the globe, she discovers a land she never anticipated or desired—yet her home is now oceans away!
"I'm in my car. Why?"Cue innocent smile...even though he couldn't see me.
This book begins with Ray’s escape from prison, which put him on the path to murder King. In an unusual historical footnote, it ends with a short epilogue in 1977, when Ray broke out of a maximum security prison and was on the lam for a few days again. The incident was a stark reminder of the undercurrent of evil that seemed to surround James Earl Ray. Something more than just his own cunning helped him plot and execute this murder, and something more than just his luck helped him escape. Sides leaves the question of whether Ray acted completely alone unanswered. Whether it was human or not, Ray had the cooperation of something sinister and evil to help him along the way.
Head over HERE and snag the deals of the day. Today Day 1 you can snag Personal Creations savings, like Free shipping on orders over $25 with code.
This is the scene when the cooking is nearly finished, a drinking tune is being played and strong alcohol is being passed around the audience they must flick three drops from the cup into the sky before drinking the rest in one go.
and what better motivation is there? than to serve the King of Kings?
The ESDC's 10-year project "is a public relations and marketing scheme; it does not exist in a legally enforceable form," argues George Locker, a lawyer for residents of two buildings in the AY footprint. The ESDC objects to "purported quotations" about the timetable from Bruce Ratner in the New York Times and instead points to Ratner's Daily News op-ed.
(For the rest of the article, click the link below)
In that post I told you about a newspaper article that claimed FDR did battle with zombies when he drafted the Haitian constitution (in 1917). So it turns out that modern fact checkers dispute FDR’s claim that he wrote the Constitution of Haiti. In fact, his biographers now use that claim as proof of FDR’s pervasive exaggeration and self-aggrandizement. It is true that he did once claim that he wrote it but he did not actually write it. See this blog, “FDR Did Not Write the Constitution for Haiti” and see Fredrick B. Pike’s book “FDR’s Good Neighbor Policy”. Pike writes:
4pm – “Writing the Tie-in” – Kevin and I will join friends and fellow writers Christie Golden and David Boop as we discuss the art and business of writing in someone else’s sandbox.
So this week in the car ride between my son’s school and work, I’ve been listening to the first book in The Incorrigible Children of Ashton Place series. Like most quirky but brilliant middle grade semi-fantasy novels, I wish I’d written it myself. And like with many audiobooks, I wonder what cool illustrations I’m missing.
The most interesting reality that all that happens isn't necessarily clear or fare.
where the one long rests, recovered
Even though we are twins we are like night and day. Aden is a complicated, yet simple person. He expresses his passion for music in countless ways, he can play at least five instruments at a level that would turn anyone's head....but when he plays the drums he comes alive. All his anger, frustration, even his rhythm with life comes out. When he’s not playing, his nose is in a book, usually a philosophy book, Joseph Campbell, and Carl Jung are his heroes....he thinks deeply, and wants to understand life at its core. Whoever he ends up with would have to be someone who sees music as a life form, the way he does, someone who thinks for themselves, the way he does, someone that can give him the freedom to be who he is - someone that he can hold when the darkest moments are over.....he says he’s ready to leave with Austin, our friend from Chara, because he wants peace for all of us, but I know him....I know he’s wondering that if somewhere out there, there is a girl that can understand and love him...someone that will not be afraid of who we are. Name your top 3 things you love most about Charlie: I don’t know how anyone cannot become addicted to Charlie. She is.....she is a light....it doesn’t matter how dark it is, what is happening....she finds balance. She listens, she lets you express every raging emotion, then finds a way to help you see the victory that lies ahead. Her soul is full of passion....she was born with a divine gift in music....when she plays I swear I can see her soul, her warm energy fill the room. When she smiles at me I feel as if God himself is telling me that life, no matter how complicated it is, is a gift....I find myself staring into her dark eyes, wondering what mystery she is trying to unravel, where her heart is leading her.
Happiness is all self-talk
This is a line of questioning forbidden by PC. To see that it gives Jews an especially favored status all you have to do is substitute “Mexicans” and “Mexico” for “Jews” and “Israel” in the statement above. Both statements violate PC, but which statement is more forbidden that the other?
“Exactly,” my friend said.
Here is Oliver on his special day.
In the last set of posts on God Encounters we looked at Jacob and his encounter with God. His encounter came out of fear – fear of an uncle who he thought wanted to kill him and fear of a brother who he thought wanted to kill him. Jacob ended up trying to manipulate his way out of everything but then God showed up. God showed up and wrestled with Jacob all night long. Jacob held on tightly to God. He would not let go and in that we see a picture of what we need to do. We need to hold on and in be in God’s presence and allow Him to change us from manipulators to ministers. Jacob had trouble on every side but God changed him. God changed his heart and God even changed his name. God encountered Jacob and Jacob held on till God made him let go by knocking his hip out of joint! Jacob gladly left that encounter with God with a limp that reminded Him of who God was and how great God was! God wants to do the very same for all of us.
Flying Dog Double Dog; Frederick, MD, American Strong Ale, 11.5% abv
On the inside I punched out my sentiment from Pure Innocence' My Basket of Eggs set stamped in Cherry Cobbler ink and layered this with some Happy Heart paper punched with my scallop oval punch. A strip of coordinating paper finishes off the inside.
IT IS TIME TO WAKE UP FROM THE PAST, TO STOP DREAMING OF TOMORROW AND FACE THE REALITIES OF THERE HERE AND THE NOW! THIS IS THE DARK DANGEROUS BLACK MAJORITY-RULED MARXIST-LENINIST COMMUNIST NEW SOUTH AFRICA!
Safe, Sane and Consensual is something that should be taken to heart outside the BDSM community, because that's really all that matters in the bedroom. Nothing you do behind closed doors is wrong just as long as everyone involved likes it and has made the educated decision to say 'yes'.
Leslie Marsh I love vintage and distressed materials, and I love repurposing bits and pieces into something appealing. I often see the world through a viewfinder, and I?m never sorry to have captured the wonders of my life in images.
When he went to inform her of events, he said, "Mary, I have good
Anyways, here it is! Here's my Wonky Quilt - as a tribute to the Pittsburgh Steelers!
The Black circles represent adjacent terrain or features that more probably than not will have impact on our AO. Remote airfields, homesteads outside of our AO that aren’t necessarily friendly, open areas large enough to marshal.
The accompanying writeups are terse and to the point. The photos anyway speak for themselves. The writings just briefly give the basic necessary background information. The back drop is simple and pure black. I think with such good photographs, frills are unnecessary. So simple is best and bright photos look best on dark background. I like the choice of widgets also. There aren’t any unwanted widgets. The popular post and slideshow are appropriate navigational widgets for this kind of blog. The blog roll and advertisement widgets are all related to wild life and so highly relevant. One thing I would suggest is not have all widgets on one side. It causes too much scrolling. I feel it is better to have widgets on both sides and the not so important ones below the blog as well.
Over the years I’ve learned a lot about people by observing how readily they grant “grace” to others. I surely have learned that there are many times and situations when the greatest gift I could receive is just that – a little grace.
No thought and cares are given to the meaning, significance and imperatives of general elections in a democracy of contemporary times. Politicians do not respect the very principle of elections. They are steam rolling the rakyat’s right and the space to decide which candidate and which political party they will vote for based on performance and honor, faith and hope.
It took more than 10 minutes to get the layer of ice off the windshield, then I was on my way.
But by his tragic example, Cobain had shown me that I needed to consider help. I looked up books in the library. I never checked any out, because I was scared of the librarian's look, but I made lots of copies and wrote lots of notes. I took three quizzes, and they all said I was off-the-charts depressed. By that point in her career, my mother had finally gotten decent health insurance, and I was just young enough to be on it. It was one of the hardest things I've ever done to ask her to help me see that kind of doctor. She thought I just needed to toughen up, but I'd made photocopies of those quizzes, and I showed her. She made some calls the next day.
What I Learned: I have a funny little postscript to this experience. So after I finished The Disciple Program, raced to my phone, called Tyler, and asked him where the hell he came from, we had a couple of laughs and then he casually mentioned that he’d sent me a script 8 months ago for notes. What?? I said. You’ve sent me a script before?? There’s no way I would’ve forgotten a script by this writer. So after the call, I went back through my notes and indeed, found an old script that I covered for him. I quickly remembered it. It was a script with all sorts of talent. But the story itself was all over the place and muddled. And I remember giving him that note. That he needs to focus his story more because the talent is clearly there. And just 8 months later, he came up with this. And I think that should serve as a motivator to every writer out there. You’re going to learn with each script. You’re going to get better with each script. You just have to keep writing. So stay inspired. Your own breakout moment could be a script away. :)
That's it - simple but elegant! If you have any questions at all, you can either leave it in a post below or you can email me. Please do comment if you download it, and as always, I would love to see photos of yours!
Believe it or not I intended for there to be a lot more humor in this post but the memory still haunts me. Sometimes I wake up in the middle of the night thinking I’m surrounded by trash that is going to cave in on me. The one thing it did is make me a lot neater of a person that I probably would have been otherwise. Once you witness what can happen by hoarding and not cleaning up…you never want to live in it.
DH sanded them down and primed and painted them for me. He also helped hang the track
“See” you there!
Mostly my days have been quite uneventful, minus the power tools and my family's lack of time management or any sort of organization. And it's not just my family, it's also the neighbours and the weather! Sooo...?
We must be evolution’s best,
I have not lost much weight during this last three months and I believe it's in part because of the stress I have been experiencing around these life issues. I needed a fill but didn't make the time to go, I needed your support and I didn't write to ask for it and most of all I needed to make myself a priority and do the exercise, follow the band rules and lose weight. I forgive myself though and chose to move on. I may not win the award for most weight lost in one year but I will win the award for most progress made in how I think about myself and how I think about food. I am happy. I am happy to be back in this community and to feel your support both written and unwritten. Thank you for being there.
* I didn't think it needed any of the sugar that Cheeseslave added so I'll skip it next time.
Who went home? Tracy.
Title : Hearts Without Words (Sequel of Miss Hacker)
Collectivism?
I think I still like the pretty rather than the practical look for my crafting area but I find myself looking around the house to see where I could put one of those bin racks. Maybe the garage?
Belstaff delivers a substantial variety of goods. It may well possibly be well worth for that , they’re capable Belstaff jackets to endure a whole lot. The actual carriess are produced of numerous compound, which consists of leather-based, cotton material, abs water-resist.
Though a concerted counterattack spearheaded by an armoured unit forced the Muslim militants back out of their positions by early the next morning, total casualties taken by the Danish forces (militias and army elements) were heavy. This spoke volumes as to the infiltration of Denmark by experienced jihadis, and the extent to which Muslims had armed themselves in preparation for some sort of societal breakdown.
This got me to thinking. Oregon is the number one team in the country so there shouldn’t be too much shame in kinda-sorta giving them 3/4 of a game. I know I certainly don’t feel shame. Instead I wondered how long it’s going to be before I can go back to relying on USC football games as a rock solid source of love and pride and giddy affection rather than the current situation, which is probably best described as being filled with queasy apprehension and is described even better by 30 Rock via Alec Baldwin as “a guaranteed disaster, like eating a burrito before sex.”
“He’s new, and nervous. I think he’s a virgin too.” She marveled.
Light body, not as strongly roasted as the aroma suggests but nicely smooth to start with light chocolate, a dryness, sharp berry fruits sneak in too. Ends with a mild bitterness.
All done. Jacobs homework center for the coming school year.
Susan May Warren is the RITA award-winning author of thirty novels with Tyndale, Barbour, Steeple Hill and Summerside Press. A four-time Christy award finalist, a two-time RITA Finalist, she’s also a multi-winner of the Inspirational Readers Choice award, and the ACFW Carol Award. A seasoned women’s events speaker, she’s a popular writing teacher at conferences around the nation and the author of the beginning writer’s workbook: From the Inside-Out: discover, create and publish the novel in you!. She is also the founder of www.MyBookTherapy.com, a story-crafting service that helps authors discover their voice.
There is no any problem of Accommodation for the tourists in Kaziranga as there are numbers of Hotels in Kaziranga. Hotels of Kaziranga offer a great comforts and convenience to the tourists. Hotels in Kaziranga are divided into various categories like luxury, deluxe, budget and also economy hotels. People of different categories choose the hotels as per their own choice, requirement and budget. Each of the hotels at Kaziranga National Park is equipped with modern amenities as per its category. Most of them offer airy atmosphere to the tourists. The locations of the hotels are in the clean environment so each of the hotels is having its own importance. Entire hotels of Kaziranga are famous for its serviceable staff, beautifully decorated rooms, airy and clean rooms and the most important for fresh food. Here you can easily enjoy continental as well as Indian cuisine which increases your taste buds.
No, I think I was thinking about Franklin Pierce, although I have no idea why, since I doubt I've ever thought about him except maybe in 11th grade history, taught by the worst and most memorable teacher I ever had, Big Mrs. White. Although to be honest about it, probably the only thing I remember from 11th grade history was Big Mrs. White (I'm told Little Mrs. White was an excellent teacher).
Hi all! I'm here today with an update on our neighbors and their dogs. If you don't know what happened, you can check it out here.
until I've spoken with my attorney."
gift card at Nume
I spent all week at home (and yesterday from this week!), so apart from all the to-ing and fro-ing to the airport, I have had lots of time to start or even finish new projects. In fact I made so much I will have to keep some for future posts!
Joe Paterno - what hell?
This experimental quality is very evident all throughout the film. For example, the aesthetics are quite unique from what I’ve seen in other movies. In fact, Shiver of the Vampires looks a lot like how I’d expect a gothic horror put together by hippies to turn out; the colored lights used to illuminate the nighttime scenes, the rock score, the styles of the two male vampires (that’s right, there are euro-hippie vampires). However, overall Rollin is able to blend the two seemingly disparate sets of aesthetics and make it work. There are only a few places where the experimenting doesn’t quite work. The one off the top of my head is a tracking shot used throughout the film, where the camera follows a character or characters around in a circular motion. It always stops just short of motion sickness, but it could have been dropped after the first or second time.
desmondjones said...
The feeling that I spent most of the last month fighting off was anger, the kind of gut wrenching anger that makes you want to pound and smash things, while crying so hard you can't breathe. I am getting over that, slowly, but if I let myself think about it all too much it's hard to keep from crying. Our lives are going to be much different than we planned.
Heat a large heavy-bodied saucepan over medium high heat. Once hot, add the olive oil and swirl it around so it coats the base of the pan. Add the onions and cook, stirring rather frequently, for a good ten minutes or until they are soft and well-browned. Add the garlic and cook for another couple minutes. Turn down the heat, and add the coriander, cumin and chili powder, stirring for a minute so the spices get slightly toasty and fragrant, but don't burn.
4. Journey planner with user-friendly functionalities.
Go to top of page, click on Caromal Colours for more info.
So much for me,
We were like kids in a sweet shop (candy store for you Yanks).
(Luke 24:13-35 (NIV))
The Thai Tims are currently visiting Scotland and with the support of Celtic and the Celtic Charity Foundation play a special fundraising concert at the Royal Concert Hall in Glasgow. Tickets have already sold out but you can donate here: http://www.everyclick.com/thaitimsvisit
The international team of color experts for the manufacturer of our paints, AkzoNobel (formerly ICI Paints), has already posted their selection for the 2010 Color of the Year! Here’s how they describe it in their Colour Futures brochure which can now be downloaded (click on Colour Futures link throughout this post to download the pdf of the brochure).
I personally will move my MobileMe account at the last moment possible because I still have some Macs that will never be able to run OS X Lion ever. Namely the PowerPC based Macs. In the meantime, I have been using a different iCloud account since Summer 2011.
So, here goes my 2012 To-Do List…
Source: The Miami Herald
- 7 Uruk-hai warriors. I need these for a game on Tuesday. I´m teaching a friend how to play LotR and it´s my comeback to this wonderful game. We´re playing a very basic scenario from a Battlegames in Middle-Earth issue.
and pores and lungs
He’s the hottie! And he’s apparently Heathcliff’s child via strangers…weird. And Heathcliff will ruin him too, just ’cause.
no??
Can pretty hard to do this one or very easy depend how you play and if you get lucky either way just get a group together or keep trying is the only advice you need.
To finish my Monday up, I came home to an empty house, so I did the logical thing, I indulged in my secret pleasures – Pokémon and annoying brainless pop music (I just met you and this is crazy….). I normal listen everything (apart form country, that I can’t love) but nothing beats coming home and dancing around in your underwear to some good old spice girls.
Come, sit back, relax and spend a little time venturing through the joy of Glamarella.
networks of revolutions suspended
I am a born again Christian and love the Lord with all my heart. My husband of 44 years and I live on a ranch that has been in his family for over 100 years. What an honor and a privilege that it has been preserved for the family for so long. I have two grown sons and nine grandchildren!! Ages 3 to 16, quite a houseful when we all get together. My Lord and my family rank highest in importance in my life. I have been crafting for many years but the primitive style is by far my favorite and I love creating something new and making it look old. I look forward to meeting new friends and sharing the love of primitives. Blessings to all,
I’m a mountainbike-tragic so even my road-bike was sporting knobblies on this occasion. That was fortuitous as I encountered some muddy stretches in the bush and the grassed areas were extremely waterlogged. No trouble on a mountainbike of course, but I wouldn’t be wearing white shorts if I was you. In summer, when the grassed areas are firm, almost any bike would do.
Do you remember your dreams?
I think I just need to be realistic this week: I have had a crazy July, between travelling and getting ready to travel and a one-week stint with my nieces and nephew and then several days taken up recently due to my mother breaking her wrist and needing to be driven places and such, that after all of this, I am not prepared for a full onslaught of "school" as I had hoped, and (yes, saying this to myself and everybody else ;) ), that's okay. Getting a strong morning routine going, having things ready to do with the boys, these will be great things to do this week while I figure out what to do next week. ;D
Here we have essentially the same card in a different color scheme, with a different sentiment and a different background from the same background set. Waltzingmouse backgrounds are awesome they are the full length of the card and super easy to line up and you get so many in one package. This set has 5 different backgrounds in it!
From Open Road media: Who would we be without the great teachers and mentors in our lives? In honor of Teacher's Appreciation Month, Open Road Media, an ebook publisher, asked authors to reflect on the teachers who actually "made" them the successful individuals they are today. From memories of beloved, bookish parents to appreciation of a friend who taught the importance of resilience, these stories are inspiring and worthy of sharing with friends, readers and our next generation of future writers. I'm excited to share them all for the first time on Cool Cat for you to read and share!
32.What is it that you most dislike?
A few months back I posted this regarding the Red Dirt Poetry girl and she was delighted... lets have another look, shall we?
Orioles Opening Day Starter Jake Arrieta signed for everybody who wanted a sig when the Orioles were jumping off the bus and heading into the locker room. I like both of these but the Gypsy Queen cards really look great when they've been inked!
The root of this challenge for me stems from having way too many options. On any given day, there are hundreds of things that I could be doing with my time. I have a very creative and active mind that is constantly producing thoughts, developing ideas, and entertaining a myriad of endless possibilities. While I know that I can only focus on or do one thing at a time effectively, and that multitasking is an illusion, I have to admit that I am a chronic toggler. I have an insatiable tendency to flit from one thing to the next. Please say a prayer for me as I am on the road to recovery.
That morning, I double-checked with DBD that the owls would be returned promptly. Hola, he told me, pointing to the drizzly sky. Maybe. Not maybe, I replied. Ho.
Paradise Lost: Enchantment
You know, now that I think about it, we may have fought that night with Jack but all I remember is the love.
And thank you, James, for being willing to be a “mean parent” in your children’s best interest. Know that you are not alone – thank you for letting me know I am not alone. Too bad we’re not closer and could hang out and keep our children “sugar free” together. I know it’s not easy (I’m not even going half the distance you are in avoiding sugar and it’s already tough) but I agree that it is worth it in this unhealthy world we live in. And I trust that your children will thank you one day as well, even if it is many years from now.
My tongue newly pierced
What on earth is going on?
Among the key documents and information which Obama continues to shield from the public are the following:
Coconut scraped - 3/4 cup
What does the video mean to you?
Guide to eating carbs, guilt-free
“I have to tell you that over the course of several years as I have talked to friends and family and neighbors, when I think about members of my own staff who are in incredibly committed monogamous relationships, same-sex relationships, who are raising kids together; when I think about those soldiers or airmen or marines or sailors who are out there fighting on my behalf and yet feel constrained, even now that ‘don’t ask, don’t tell’ is gone, because they are not able to commit themselves in a marriage, at a certain point I’ve just concluded that for me personally it is important for me to go ahead and affirm that I think same sex couples should be able to get married,” Obama told Roberts in an interview to appear on ABC’s “Good Morning America” Thursday.
But since this is a photo shootout, here's a picture.
Without further ado, here is my spring mantel. It is my spring break and I finally have the time to decorate! I have been coveting simplicity and clean colors and it shows in my mantel.
Instead, I laughed, "Noooo!"
Thus begins Pi Patel’s epic, 227-day voyage across the Pacific, and the powerful story of faith and survival at the heart of Life of Pi. Worn and scared, oscillating between hope and despair, Pi is witness to the playing out of the food chain, quite aware of his new position within it. When only the tiger is left of the seafaring menagerie, Pi realizes that his survival depends on his ability to assert his own will, and sets upon a grand and ordered scheme to keep from being Richard Parker’s next meal.
will stick to the dark
Firstly, apologies for the lack of activity on my blog, but I’ve been geeking it up at a sci-fi convention. This is something I never thought I’d go to, but it was so unexpectedly awesome that I’m learning to embrace my inner nerd fully.
39) My grandmother was Cherokee, and my grandad was a mix of a couple of different tribes. Not that you could tell by looking at me. White bread all around; I take after my dad's side, mainly. The Native American's on my mom's side.
That wasn’t a correct sentence, but who cares.
and sometimes I want to reply to someone else's comment
It was in a state of semi undress (no cardi, no coat just a short sleeved dress) on a cold autumn morning, face contorted with wails of protest, as I attempted to safely get her across a rather busy road, that the incident happened. A lady, late fifties, clearly well to do, decided she knew better than me how to handle my children. So she opted to turn her car around and drive over to me, pull up, wind down her window and inform me that 'maybe your child would be happier if you dressed her properly, put a coat on her'. Said coat was dangling useless in my hand, repeated attempts to get the damn thing on toddler girl had ended badly; there are only so many battles you can take on in one morning. Next to me stood wee man, suitably wrapped up against the weather - clearly I knew how to do it - it was obvious toddler girl wasn't co-operating. What right did this woman have to vent her unasked for wisdom on me? So she got the full throttle of my angst and frustration, which was phrased more delicately than I'd have liked thanks to the presence of the wee ones. My tirade ended with 'look, she has a coat you nosey old cow'. Which I thought was quite mild in the circumstances.
Cooper had a crib supplied by the hotel for sleeping during our stay. We first tried to place the crib near the entrance of the room and block his view with a sheet tapped to the ceiling. This worked the first night, probably because he was exhausted from traveling. The next night and nap times were a different story. We needed to move his crib away from the door so Kevin and I could still use the bathroom and leave if needed. We moved some furniture, taped up the sheet and hoped for the best.
While strolling through Etsy the other day, I came across the shop, Wild Juniper... and I can truly say it was love at first sight. The mama behind Wild Juniper very obviously has some talent. Her shop is overflowing with adorableness as fas as the eye can see. One of my favorite things to buy for Ms. Rozzlyn are the cute headbands with the fabric roses... I think they are so super cute and shabby chic and add the perfect touch of girlie-ness to my bald baby. :) This one most definitely needs to be added to our collection.
2010: 4.22% ABV
It is true that Piper tangled with a well-armed member of Delta Force in a Denny’s parking lot in Texas.
Here comes Sheamus to counteract, a former 2-time WWE Champion.
3 dashes Angostura Bitters
But, my affectionate Father, I am humbled to the dust that I am not more affected at what affects you! I repent of being “slothful in zeal”! No more, Father! Make me boil in spirit as I serve you (Romans 12:11)! To be moved by your glorious gospel and precious promises (2 Peter 1:4) is why you gave me affections! Nothing in earth or heaven is greater or more important.
My friend decided to auction off items that were destined for her son to raise money to donate to Heartfelt. I fell in love with this little vest, made by Lesley at Cherub's Kiss.
However, Sone’s spirituality is purposely flimsy and transparent. In a world driven by the desire of the dollar and mired in a pervading cynicism over the power of symbols in the arts, the snow and the snowflake quickly become weak, easily commodified institutions. The multiplication and marketable quality of the snowflake and the winter landscape suggest kitschy or low brow attempts at spirituality. Sone’s glass snowflakes register like enlarged versions of grandmother’s dated paperweights. The landscape becomes one for skiing and resorts. The beautiful and the sublime become simply “pretty.”
With a big, back-slappin' thanks to the likes of Coyote Mike and Billy Goat Bruce... the last couple of years, we've been offering our hundred or so 4H Shooting Sports kids a chance to step into the old west where men were men, gals were gals, and hammers down on empty chambers reminded them that gun safety is the law around this here town.
might be a little more familiar
So we went shopping, I spent a lot of money!
Then we're back at Monkey Beach. Mandi-manda sikit sebelum balik.
One note, however. These pieces are not puzzle-like interlocking sets and were not designed to have curtain walls along the sides. The idea was that the gamer would build angular snaking sections which can be placed together in various configurations, but they do not interlock. Curtain walls along the sides, in our experience, tend to get in the way of model placement and a clear view of the action, so the vertical dividers, mostly doors but also including bulkheads without doors, are meant to create dead ends or dividers.
I don't know about you but I certainly cant wait for this. In fact I can't wait for the season. It really is a smashing one. So please grab yourselves a brochure, get yourselves following us on Twitter and Facebook and pop yourselves on our mailing list.
The crowd cheers and I hit the throttle to give them more of what they came for, pushing the bike until it's vibrating so hard that my hands start to go numb.
In case some of you don't know, these were the subjects for the previous few:
Good Neighbors C N.UM $6.00
Now, a few people commented in my post about UFO's that they had knitting UFO's. I don't, but my motivation definitely waned on the second sock. Honestly, these socks took a LONG time - 2 months! I was definitely in danger of succumbing to Second Sock Syndrome (SSS): a knitter's inability to finish the second sock of a pair after the first sock has been completed.
I tuned to look (a little startled) and he was holding this HUUUUUGE teddy bear and a little box. I screamed because I was so excited. I opened the door and he handed me the box which had this adorable necklace with a locket that said "Promise" on the front.
and marked by a deep feeling of conviction as described for us in James 5:16(AMP):
In any event, I'd like to start highlighting some of the little "finds" I've discovered in Georgia and include independent shops, restaurants, and other businesses along the way.
I painted a little wooden picture frame with blue paint.. then swiped my brush through to give it "texture"
Now, I know some of you are thinking that books are expensive. They are! That is if you go for newly-produced ones. Of course they'll cost you. But there are alternatives to these mainstream bookstores. Second-hand bookstores are everywhere. They offer a wide selection of pre-loved books, ranging from a vast variety of topics. The good thing about these ukay book shops is that they sell books for waaaay less than what they would cost in say, Powerbooks or National Bookstore, or Fully Booked. That's because their copies are already in mint condition, but still very much readable nevertheless.
Fact: before Naika came to our home, she and we both developed patterns, movements, belief systems, personalities . . . apart from each other.
This giveaway is a thank you to all my regular blog followers who put up with all the DivergentNation -TeamAbnegation -Insurgent Release craziness this past month.
Q: What if you’re hosted on WordPress.com or some other system that does not allow Javascript?
Ivy/Nick- Nick tells Ivy he signed with an agency and is going to Afghanistan on a combat photojournalism assignment. Ivy asks Naomi to give Nick a job as a photographer at the event she’s running. Nick happens to meet a documentarian at the event and he gets another job as a still photographer. Ivy basically (and passive aggressively) tells him not to die in a war zone. Ivy later apologizes. The two make up. Zzzzzzzzz.
The cruise missile, when it showed up in the 1980s, was one of the first UAVs, it just wasn’t reusable. But UAVs that carry bombs and missiles, and can be reused, are going to provide competition for a new, $3 million, Cruise Missile XR.
“You very very tight here… ” she said, pointing to my calves. ” maybe you run a lot??” Yes! I thought.. I DO run a lot!
…stress
I thought I’d share a photo of my boy, my first pet from when I moved on my own:
arms and heads, chopped off in battle, shall join
Jane (performed by Amelia Clarkson and then Mia Wasikowska) has had a lonely and bleak childhood. She was abandoned by her parents and a heartless aunt I(by Sally Hawkins) gave her lodgings before sending her to a charity home for girls. From here, Jane is engaged as a governess at Thornfield, the home of Mr Rochester (by Michael Fassbender), to care for his daughter. The housekeeper, Mrs Fairfax (by Judi Dench) is the first person to ever treat Jane kindly and she warms to her. She has a happy life at Thornfield, excelling as a governess and enjoying the landscape and lifestyle in the country. Gradually a tentative, then deep relationship develops between Jane and Mr Rochester. But the path of true love is difficult for this pair and several barriers arise that threaten to destroy any chance of happiness they may have.
8. Is Winamp trying to make me cry? This is Secrecy - "The One to Adore". Ultimate teenage anxiety & nostalgia metal. Their albums are called ART IN MOTION and RAGING ROMANCE, for christ's sake. This band is amazing. There's absolutely nothing sub-par in these two albums (and even the demo "Like Burning One's Boat", it's even a bit thrashier if you'd like to see the connection between thrash-thrash, techno-thrash and then proper progressive metal). Every song is stellar. No filler. Such a range of emotion covered. So many atypical guitar ideas, and yet not to the detriment of catchiness. Superb engineering. More bands should study what Secrecy achieved here. Then again, perhaps not. There really is no other entity in metal that makes me feel like this, best keep it, uh, secret.
Out doing something a million times better?
My next long run is the weekend of the 28th where I will go for 9 mile run, 1 miles cool down walk. Honestly, this distance is as far as I am going to train for the race. I am very scared about injuring myself prior, but then again, I don't want to be taken off the course on a stretcher, so thinking about what my long run on Feb 11th weekend will be. I got up to 11 miles last year before my injury in January and basically do no training after that and I finished, so not too worried....heck I can walk alot of it if need be!
Back at the Conglomerate's country house, Hex and Stiletta are 'guests' of the head of the Conglomerate. The head explains about the global war that contaminated the global drinking supply and how nomad gangs starting taking over various regions. The world was a living hell until Nobel chemist Wilfred Soames, located near Lake Victoria in Tanzania, devised a tablet that would purify a gallon of water almost instantly. Soames had planned on distributing the tablets for free in order to save the world. The Conglomerate had different ideas.
‘It means you hope to corrupt these good people with your talk of swill and wisdom. They don’t need to know the difference they just to need to have faith.’
Who hasn’t been in the situation of not knowing what you want to do in life? (No, really, who hasn’t? I want to meet that person and bottle that knowledge.) What makes this book stand out in an over-saturated self-help market is the way it explores the reasons you don’t know what you want to do. Chapter by chapter, Sher uncovers the psychological blocks to pursuing what you really love and gives you practical exercises to help you work through them. This is an incredibly helpful book that I find myself referring to friends again and again as we all navigate the rough waters of career choices and personal identity.
i went mostly random.
Next came time for the demonstration of making chocolate using the traditional tools. The Mano and Metate are used to grind the fermented, roasted partially ground cacao beans into a chocolate paste. These tools can be compared to a mortar and pestle in function. The form is different as the metate is a horizontal tray upon which, through a specific technique, the beans and nibs are crushed to make the chocolate paste. At Cyrila’s Farm the mano and metate is made from basalt, a volcanic stone material that has been handed down through the generations.
If you buy it, know what you’re getting into and enjoy it for what it is.
So that leaves the slow-baked apple, chocolate and peanut butter mousse, and vanilla crème brulee as unexplored menu items. Alex, when are you coming back to NYC?
Syria: Lies And Terror Get The Job Done
Add the wet ingredients to the dry ingredients and mix well to combine. No traces of flour should be seen. I did this with a wire whisk. Beater is unnecessary.
In the first quarter of 2012, Benishek raised only $932,000; trailing the average House incumbent by around $268,000 for the quarter – nearly 30%. Furthermore, only 11% of the donations Benishek received were small donations from individual donors, leading one to believe the closer he gets to election day, the narrower his fundraising base will ultimately be – a unquestionably negative sign for Benishek.
After failing to qualify for the semis back in 2009, the Archers bounced back last season, finishing with a record of 8 wins and 6 losses securing the last spot for the semis. The team managed to barge into the semis last year, surprising many because most of the Archers were rookies and sophomores. However, the Animo of the Archers last season prevailed. After the season, the team also fared well, handing down Ls to teams such as the SBC Red Lions and even the reigning UAAP champs Ateneo Blue Eagles. With the team’s performance last season, the fans saw Season 74 as the season wherein the Archers can assert its dominance in the league. The expectation intensified with the arrival of Norbert Torres and Arnold Van Opstal, two players that were expected to provide the much-needed size and authority in the paint. La Revilla also returned, after missing two seasons. The green team’s back on the map, a legitimate championship contender. We can almost smell and feel it. Taft shall have its glory days again, a new dynasty’s about to unfold.
SHEFFIELD
By chance, we met at the pub. I was singing with my guitar. She came up to me, drunk in her sorrows. That night, she poured out her life.
Step 8 (In Which The Chocolate Bar Teams Up With The Penguins): There is no picture of me grating the chocolate bar for the chocolate shavings. This was the worst part of the whole process. I didn’t freeze the chocolate bar, so wherever I held it, it melted around my fingers as I grated. The pieces would snap off, so that I had to grate about 15 little half-inch-sized, semi-melted pieces of chocolate, rather than just holding the six-inch bar from the top and grating merrily all the way down, the way I had envisioned. It was messy and irritating and I scraped my finger more than once. Meanwhile, the hockey game raged on, a series of unfortunate events and stunned moments of disbelief.
Here are the projects I created. To check out the challenges, head on over to My Scraps and More!
When Chelsea, Matt, and I started our non-profit work with Cat’s Cradle, it was just another cat shelter. Now Cat’s Cradle is known on a nationwide scale. We would like to take the credit, but all the credit goes to Corky, the abnormal kitten with backward legs whose story of surgery and recovery has touched millions. As Matt stated in his blog, “Corky the cat has exploded in popularity, donations have been pouring in from the UK, Australia, Mexico, Italy, Brazil, Canada, all over the United States, and doesn’t look like the momentum is slowing down anytime soon. What was originally a fundraiser with a goal of only a couple thousand dollars to cover the costs of Corky’s operations and rehabilitation, has turned into over $16,000 worth of generous donations.”
I'm working from home today, which rocks because I can access both my office desktop and my complete ITunes library. The latter of which is playing some nifty Velvet Underground.
Shred the beef. Cut the cleaned carrots into tiny cubes and finely chop the onion.
On the midsummer fairground alive with the sound
1 burst
She may be a controversial figure in Singapore, being vilified by many for the mess SMRT is in now, but ex-SMRT CEO Saw Phaik Hwa is still popular among SMRT staff as they threw a farewell party for her yesterday afternoon at Jurong Crew Station, packed with more than 100 staff from the Rail Operations Branch comprising Train Officers, Customer Services Officers from stations, OCC, HQ and the Circle Line.
The deacons were raised up to run the food distribution ministry of the church. Was their ministry strictly limited to distributing food? What does Stephen (one of the deacons) do? What happens to him?
This may sound funny but to release some anger and remember that you are not a punching bag in someone else’s life, turn this on. She belts her emotions like none other in this powerful rant about a cheating boyfriend. I’ve sang this a few times directing it at more than one individual at more than one time. Therapeutic. Dare I say, I even belted this out after drinking far too much on Karaoke night. Thankfully, it was a back woods redneck bar that nobody (hopefully) remembers seeing me at.
The attorney had forwarded me the guidelines for legal mail–legal mail for an attorney. And Shawn Merriman almost got in a lot of trouble because I was following those guidelines, too, when I reported to him regarding our children through letters. I was afraid anything like certified mail would get my former husband in even more trouble with the jail staff. I told my pastor we just couldn’t do that, certified mail could be really bad.
You can get into all your Polish favourites here, like makowiec ($10), a sweet bread stuffed with poppy-seed paste and smothered in icing. If poppy seeds aren't your style, try the soft and spongy drozdzowka yeast cake ($3 for a slice, $7.50 for a slab) with a crumble topping. Paczek Polish donuts ($1.50) filled with a squirt of plum jam are the most popular, often sold out by mid-morning.
In the ultrasound we were stuck with Ms. No Personality as our ultrasound tech. As Ruben and I are were googling and giggling over our baby, she quickly snapped at us and told me "Every time you laugh you make the baby move. Stop laughing." Um. Sorry.
“I’m only on chapter one, but I’ll try. Think of a number between one and ten.” Hercules decided on 6 as his number, then nodded. “Ok, is it 3?”
The sheep, of course, are oblivious to the sometimes bloody history surrounding them, and continue to shave the meagre turf as I continue to Castle Farm. Two grey-and-white donkeys dawdle around in their paddock dolefully, as is the way of donkeys, in contrast to the cheery sign on the fence: ‘Hello! We are Teddy and Patches. We are rescue donkeys. We are on special diets, please do not feed us’. Maybe that’s why they look so downcast.
Dear Father,
Sally (Great name) Henley!
Just three notes for the last several weeks, although I had a wonderful dinner with pairings that is its own post if I get to it.
Finally I can't go without giving a plug to my friend Lynn. Making custom hats is something she does on the side; her primary business is making excellent hat patterns. Check them out here, or got to www.lynnmcmasters.com and click on "Pattern Orders" at the top. She's even got instructions on manipulating straw braid and blocking buckram! Even if you have no interest in home millinery, stop by her site and check out her amazing work.
And then the whole aspect of using the blog as an element of change and raising awareness happened in April of 2009. Learning very personal lessons about poverty, homelessness, friendship and hardship.
Now, the one thing about zombies are they’re there to be made fun of. Okay, they are scary, but they’re slow, simple and frankly, repetitive. The fright factor’s gone.
If you would like to order your catalog today, you can use the PayPal "Buy It Now" button to the right. I charge you half price for the catalogs plus $5 for priority shipping($9.99 total). I also have the Spanish Idea Book/Catalogs which should be arriving in the next day or so, if you would like a Spanish book, let me know.
"The new law expands the list of protected categories beyond race, color, religion or national origin, and for the first time, allows the federal government to prosecute violence undertaken because of the actual or perceived gender, gender identity, sexual orientation, or disability of any person."
- 2 large garlic cloves, chopped
Creating your own invitations can be fun. And if it is for a child, they could be involved -- a good Mom and me crafty idea!!
Nora continues to eat very well. She is a very content baby. What pure love she is!
You have reached the top of the long uphill struggle. For a little while now, you have approached the edge of the downhill grade. Give it that heave now and watch as the hurtling rush to the bottom picks up speed. This is a good picture, except in this case the bottom will really be the highest point you have ever experienced. Your expectations of this event are great. Let us tell you now that you can have no idea how great they will be.
Well, the Catholics, of course.
He proposed a height limit at the four spots to 12 storeys, with more storeys beyond the 12 to be allowed only through bonusing.
It turned out that Ghana’s Vice President was meeting some Chinese foreign officials for a discussion over supper, and they happened to have good taste.
Linen stole muffler (Light beige): Creamshop (no longer available)
Non-seasonally adjusted data (Real) shows unemployment is 7.1%. The released figure of 6.7% is the seasonally adjusted total.
$55 will get you a seat (I'll provide the table) and it's only $50 for Courthouse Restaurant Beer Listers.
Is it embarrassing to not know how to cook at 33 years of age? Is it embarrassing to sign up for cooking classes (if you can find them) at my age? Is it???
※Doors-open/Event starting times are subject to change.
Piezano’s – A neighborhood place on the corner of 27th and South that has a pepperoni cream cheese pizza, a potato pizza and a chicken tuscany. They also do all the classic pizza staples and they have thin, medium or deep dish crust. I don’t make it over there as often as I’d like, but every trip is enjoyable.
Meanwhile, in the real world interracial relations are rapidly becoming old news, even in the heartland. Paul Taylor, director of the Pew Hispanic Center, recently revealed a poll that found 15 percent of marriages in the United States are interracial, compared with only about 0.1 percent in 1961. “The human heart is the last frontier,” Taylor said.
I am a soon to be a 65 year-old who has voted in every state and local election since 1966. I have voted for both Republicans and Democrats alike. I have worked on campaigns for both Republicans and Democrats, white and black. I served the country that I love in Vietnam, as my son did in the Middle East. I was awarded two bronze stars. I have been involved in politics since age 6 when my father was campaign manager for a truly great American Congressman, Charles Raper Jonas, who worked for his constituents and his country, and was to be admired, unlike you.
Your gran liked sausages (most people do)
Rojas: What is your work schedule like when you're writing? How do you balance it with your day job? Can you tell our readers what your day job is?
with the thanksgiving holiday behind us, it's now time for me to focus on busting out some work in preparation for this weekends Big Crafty. it will be very interesting being the size of a house, and doing a huge craft show like this. luckily evan is the best helper, and i know he'll be an amazing right hand man... and sometimes probably my left hand too. i love that man-o-mine :)
The restricted activities of Hashimoto’s work, when taken with his use of solid colorful shapes on his kites, force the metaphor of the installation into the social realm, the world of kite flying as leisure during political and religious holidays in countries like Japan. Often his kites carry the colors and shape of flags as kites often do in the festivals of Asia. Hashimoto wants to extend the metaphor of his work to include the symbolic reasons why we fly kites in general, our ambitions to fly and the strings that won’t allow us to do so.
Another bloke there, a Methodist who was a health educator, seemed to have much the same ideas — scared to stick his neck out — and he said you could ask any of the people at Limehill whether they liked living there, and they would all say yes, and that they are satisfied, because they knew it would be the worse for them if they didn’t, and they would only get into trouble.
Continuing my 1000 gifts, here are some of the beautiful things on my runs:
Business professors find LinkedIn to be extremely useful, and so will you. They use LinkedIn to get reacquainted with former friends, associates and former students, sending out an occasional personal note to a few members of their network. In addition, they connect with consulting clients, directors and staff of state CPA societies, professionals at the FASB and PCAOB. Professors make these connections because it is easy to have directed communication through LinkedIn. Not only do professors need to send notes to, they also receive communications from textbook authors, journalists, professionals and form students through LinkedIn.
It may be dated for those of us living at the cutting edge of 1977 but I can't deny I do have a soft spot for this kind of music.
I suggested perhaps we shouldn’t give gifts. She agreed, even as she was handing me another gift.
~ arranging ticket-takers and CD sellers
Occasionally, Murphy has offered statements that, with passage of time, come across as unintentionally ironic.
11 yet
They say the early bird gets the worm. I guess this gentleman couldn't wait till 6:00pm today for the biblical "Rapture" to finally arrive. And I'm sure members of the Jewish community in Williamsburg on hand for the spectacle of today's daredevil show had a different plan for observing their Sabbath day other than looking up at this guy.
This should be a red flag for any product or solution, whether digital or analog, that isn’t minimally complex. If you’re making the customer do any extra amount of work, no matter what industry you call home, you’re now a target for disruption. Because of the Internet’s scale and the speed of change in the world, the Innovator’s Dilemma has mutated over the years into a pernicious, methodically destructive force, leaving any company that is even the slightest bit more cumbersome, costly, or inefficient to be beat out by a newer, more streamlined competitor.
As ARMADILLO played out, one has to marvel at how far we've come with being able to experience the truth of war. International forces have been entrenched in Afghanistan for ten years now, so you'd think the concept of embedded journalism would be old hat by now. It isn't - not by a longshot. With ARMADILLO we are watching engagements first-hand, getting that lump in our throat as events happen rather than reacting to the people involved recount them. Part of what makes ARMADILLO stand out is the absence of talking heads - and we don't miss them for a moment.
saying with a loud voice, “Fear God and give glory to Him, for the hour of His judgment has come; and worship Him who made heaven and earth, the sea and springs of water.”
We are factually free yet functionally frozen, isolated captives in an expansive world of opportunity, beauty and vitality. What is holding us back? Our thoughts! We are imprisoned by our own minds. The hard truth is that freedom–to connect with people, to try new things, to break out of castes and classes and stereotypes–is risky to explore. We listen to “the world” and decide that it is indeed a terrifying place to explore. We hear about people who harm others, take advantage of others and we conclude that people aren’t all that safe either. We allow our thoughts to deny us freedom.
I used Crate Paper's Farmhouse almost exclusively on this layout...I love all of their new lines...just got the Random collection in this week, finally! Hoping to get some scrappy time SOON!!
I'll be honest, it was quick tricky to apply. It's very thin and you can quite easily have too much on the brush. I had to do a bit of touching up of the edges when I was finished as it was so thin some of it has spilled to the edges. But....I adore the colour!!! It's the perfect grey I was looking for (although it did take a good three coats to achieve). I'm not sure how well it will last as it's such a cheap price but for £1.99 you can't go wrong and for now I'm a little bit in love with it!
This sign, which once hung on someone's car, lies on a wall next to a Brooklyn Heights parking lot.
and glitter
Worldwide tablet sales to end users are expected to total 118.9 million units in 2012, with Apple continuing to dominate and the Android camp struggling to replicate its success in the smartphone market, according to Gartner.
“It is a dangerous game we’ve never played before, and we can’t afford to play it now,” he warned. “People are fed up with a town where compromise has become a dirty word.”
He looked as if I had punched him right between the ribs. "Alone?"
From the day they met to the day they married: 4 months.
Workbox/File 3:Apologia Science book, read pages 25-26
1/2 cup sunbutter
The BLACKFRIDAY Coupon Code
"Nothing. We are taking care of everything." My sister and I exchange glances. We are both concerned about how often he is asking this question. I touch his hand which is still burning up with fevers. "You are confused right now because of the fever. It is like being in a 103 degree room. It will get better, Dad. I love you. I took care of everything. I talked to the nurse and the doctor."
I want to take this chance to tell everyone what I am thankful for. There are so many blessings I have: Good Health, Family, Friends, a fun job, and the chance to live in a wonderful country. And, I have so many wonderful online friends that I never get a chance to thank, for their inspiration and support.
Both. Actually, my preference is probably beer (if it's Guinness), but if it came right down to it, I'd take a glass of red wine.
My Cryptic Communication
Anyone who suffers with depression knows that the core of who we are is or has been suffering some kind of trauma. What is it that rocks our world in such a way that little bits of ourselves flake away while we desperately try to hold it together? Sometimes there are answers and sometimes there aren't. I've always desperately wanted answers. I felt that if I could only understand my depression I could solve it and it would go away. Not so. I understand bits of it but not the whole. Sometimes the more I try to work it all out, the more it eludes me and that is frustrating. I have learnt that I have to go with the flow and sometime I'm kicking and screaming all the way, it feels just too hard. But then I'm reminded of the gum tree.
What has medical research found out about the risks and benefits of hormone use after menopause?
You don’t have to be a chimp to use our products, but it helps.
Maggie: "Iyayoo moi."
3. Committing yourself. Even once you’ve made time and planned what you want to accomplish, if you don’t bring your best intentions to the desk, it probably won’t get done. If I sit down to write, but find that I can’t stop thinking about the talk I had with my son’s teacher at school about a potential learning disability, or about whether or not to grow my hair out, then I’m not really there to write. I’m not committed and it’s worth getting up and doing something else until I’ve got all three elements aligned.
In one rapid motion, Mylune releases Mortimer, grabs Garrosh, and clasps him to her bosom, swaying side to side energetically.
I do not understand how people who (ostensibly) passed medical school cannot wrap their heads around this simple concept, but we have got to make this stop.
2. The only physical damage made during the filming of National Lampoon’s Animal House was when John Belushi made a hole in the wall with a guitar. The actual Sigma Nu fraternity house (which subbed for the fictitious Delta House) never repaired it, and instead framed the hole in honor of the film.
The final act (onboard the fishing boat) is still one of the most relentless and entertaining third acts ever made. And who really cares if you can’t actually blow up a three ton shark by shooting the scuba tank lodged in its mouth? It’s no more ridiculous than Jeff Goldblum destroying an entire alien civilization in Independence Day by firing up his laptop, and is sure as hell a better ending than the one offered by original Jaws author Peter Benchley, where the shark simply rolls over and dies. By the way, if you never read the original novel, don’t bother. It sucks.
This year has also seen the continuation of my often all-consuming fascination with the work of Jean-Luc Godard. One of my angriest posts of the year was prompted by a review of the Richard Brody Godard biography in the New York Times. In response to this review, and the generally dismissive attitude towards Godard's post-60s oeuvre that it represented, I wrote Everything is Cinema and Criticism Is Nothing. In the aftermath of this essay, I attempted to answer the lack of serious attention towards late Godard by writing about his post-60s films myself, though not in any methodical or chronological order. Over the course of the year, I watched and wrote about Hélas pour moi, JLG/JLG, Numéro Deux, British Sounds, Germany Year 90 Nine Zero, Here and Elsewhere, and Le gai savoir. Godard remains my favorite filmmaker, as the name of this blog itself doubtless attests. His films are never less than thought-provoking, and they are often positively earth-shaking.
There are many techniques out there on how to pull readers into our orbits, and even more for how to keep them there. We need to constantly be looking for ways to look at the blogging world through different, unique lenses. By gaining this awareness of orbiters, Earths, Saturns, and Moons, we are thinking about the blogosphere in a way that will set us apart from others. And setting ourselves apart is the first step to becoming Saturns.
Note to self: Next time, bring ski goggles.
really- do we ?
"You must trust and believe in people or life becomes impossible."
The noise brought a man out of a nearby block of flats. With little regard for his own safety he waded in and defended me until my attackers ran away.
Yes, it's already the third Thursday in the month which means it's time for our monthly blog hop over on Mo's Dream Team blog! This month's theme has been set by our wonderful Debby 4000 (as opposed to the other Debbie P but equally wonderful!). That theme is Verdigris - show us a bit of green in your card.
"I start my new job tomorrow."
and she comes to you light as the breeze.
a clashingclangingshifting bedrock.
Park: Just testing my theory.
There were a thousand stories in the naked city. And hers would be one they’d talk about for years to come.
One of the highlights of the course was running past Andrea and Jason’s house, where I got to high five JT and see the sign they’d made. It was at this point where I gave an older lady a pep talk, telling her she was over halfway there. “You are over halfway there,” she corrected me. She was running the full for her 50th birthday. I was so proud of her and told her I’d be there with her someday.
Yom ha-Atzmaut officially begins with a special national ceremony at 8:00 pm - the lighting of 12 torches at Har Herzl in Jerusalem. I watched part of the ceremony with my friends, something I hadn't done before during my previous visits to Israel. It was interesting. Apparently, every year there is a different theme and the organizers choose people connected to that theme to light the torches. The theme this year was water, so people from organizations that have something to do with water (like Mekorot, the national water carrier) or activists from groups that work for clean water (like the Society for the Protection of Nature) were chosen. Each person was introduced, then stepped forward, said a few words ending with "to the splendor of the state of Israel" (לתפארת מדינת ישראל), and then lit the torch.
Laurie consistently makes you reflect on life with her writing. Her book Wintergirls about teenage eating disorder and its consequences, once again, doesn’t pull any punches. The story is so visceral that your gut will hurt while reading it.
"And now shall we sing the Whiffenpoof song?"
Were your publishers open to all your ideas or did you have to censor yourself and tone down some of the horror elements because of your target audience?
She added: “Not only are the soldiers incredibly brave, a few were also incredibly cute. I came back with a phone number.
So anyway that's where we are in this thing we do..
Von Zerneck/Sertner Films
I paired this pretty blue polish with an accent silver foil nail, Sally Hansen Chrome Nail Makeup in "Titanium Chrome". Both applied smoothly in 2 coats, and once topped with 1 coat of Seche Vite, dried perfectly!
I'm going to make a concerted effort to participate in the creativity workshop this weeks, but I'm not holding my breath. I can feel it slipping on my priority list and unfortunately with the schedule I've got going now, something's gotta give.
The goal here is to have applications that can store your files in any of these cloud architectures. Already, we are seeing some apps that use, for example, iCloud or Dropbox as a storage/syncing point. This is fantastic, and paves the way for some truly awesome interoperability between, say, PCs and Macs. It becomes less about the hardware or even the OS you are using and more about the app. Running Evernote on Mac, but also on a work PC? No problem, your notes are all there.
Honestly you did it to yourself
"Oh...that's what she wants to put in her new big house..."
(Student was silent.)
She hesitated just briefly before responding. "You sound disoriented," she told him.
From the very beginning and until the finish, author James Dashner provides barely enough information to answer the questions that form in the reader’s mind but what information he gives does promote one to keep reading. I found myself reading the book in one sitting because I just had to know what was going on and how the story was going to end.
everybody, everybody wants to hunt
Fermi was one of the transcendental geniuses of his time who worked on the first atomic bomb, the Manhattan Project. All the lead-up calculations to the first test explosion were very blue-sky. They were even unsure of the order of magnitude they might be dealing with. AAMOF, there’s a story that prior to the explosion, Fermi was taking bets on whether or not it would ignite the atmosphere and destroy the entire universe, or at least the earth, maybe just New Mexico. (Yes, Fermi was a funny guy.) But that’s not the Fermi story I wanna tell. It’s this. Because they wanted to know just how much power they were producing, they set up lots and lots of sophisticated sensors and measurement devices to monitor the blast. It took quite a while after the explosion for the calculations to be completed but as the blast happened, Fermi dropped some torn-up pieces of paper and from their displacement, he quickly calculated it at about 10 kilotons.
There’s this Letterman-style variety show on Univision called “Esta Noche Tonight” that I won’t link because this post is about things I like. I’m watching it with my mom in her kitchen in Miami. Charo is a guest, although you wouldn’t know it because in lieu of asking her questions about her new show in Las Vegas, “Charo in Concert: A Musical Sensation” (starting July 10 at the Riviera Hotel and Casino), they have a campesino character with oversized prosthetic ears, crossed eyes and bongo drums sitting beside her inventing stories about a childhood as a fake weirdo. (This kind of shit is so disappointing; Kristen Wiig, I’m talking to you and your back-scratcher hands.)
My favorite is when they create editorials that give ideas of what you can do in real life, such as have a hot date night in with a vampire, which was featured in the April edition of Glamour. Here are some of the highlights:
2 tomatoes, cut into wedges
The decision is a clear reminder of the careful balancing act that faces biotech patent applicants between ensuring they are first to file in a highly competitive and fast-moving industry v the need to do sufficient research to disclose the use of the invention in the patent application.
I see it differently. If you hire me and start out by giving me a wage that is less than I need to live a decent, pleasant life, you have already made me your enemy before I’ve even started working. And this is because you have proven that you don’t value me. You don’t think my life has worth and meaning. You want my heart and sweat and life blood, and you hold all that so cheaply you won’t give me a fair price for it. How could I not regard you as an enemy?
Beer consumption has been increasing steadily while the consumption of wine and spirits has been flat. This, they argue is largely due to emerging economies like China increasing their consumption dramatically:
On Monday the High Court in Johannesburg handed down judgment on a review of the Independent Communications Authority of SA's (Icasa) claim that it did not have jurisdiction over how the SABC made its programmes.
Dawn simulators are lighting devices or fixtures that are programmed to turn on gradually, from dim to bright light, to simulate the sunrise. They are sometimes prescribed for individuals who have difficulty getting up in the morning due to SAD symptoms.
It was a dark and stormy night (some cliché bullshit to start us off) and I, John Smithson had just finished a hard day's work down the cookie mine. Normally I'd have driven home but due to a spell of bad luck, my car was in for repair and I'd missed the last bus home. The walk was only a few miles so I just got on with it.
“That anyone finds “positive progress” in Fiji is because it is real and because the Bainimarama Government has been working diligently to provide a better future for all Fijians.”
Otherwise they would/should be proud showing their evidence against me.
Oh wait. The kitchen. It needs a desperate overhaul before Wolfgang can cook there.
This is an easy recipe
so what.
We hope these haiku have inspired you to write.
Dr. Guo-Liang Wang, Ohio State University, USA and CAAS, China.
1/2 cup cilantro leaves plus sprigs, for garnish
We are, indeed, in a constant state of change, and the yin waning moon here (emphasized by Mercury retrograde) gives us ample time not only to reflect, but also to finish the fine points of our Full Moon before moving on to a new cycle, preparing us for the unknown held firmly within the arms of the coming New Moon. New Moon date is March 22nd. Sun enters Aries this year on March 19th, so this coming New Moon will contain all of the emotional power of Pisces and the physical power of planting as the Sun enters into the sign of growth and planting. New seeds are at the forefront right now, but only through reflection and endings
up all over the place and an industry comprised of mostly independent businesses is staring a recession in the face, raising a middle finger and shouting FUCK YOU! This isn’t because of one single brewery, beer or bar, this renaissance is down to us, the drinker, the end user. We’ve been buying these beers and shouting our love for them all over town, we are responsible for this and we should be proud of ourselves. The UK beer scene is only going to get bigger, ale of all kinds is going to continue to take market share away from other beverages and more breweries, bars, bottle shops and brewpubs are going to continue springing up all over the place. Hell, if I had the cash and
However, when it comes time to really write the story, there can't just be a witches hat, because it is not reality. You see, in our lives, there are good days and bad, times when we triumph and times when we fail. And if we want our stories and characters to be believable, even if they are very make believe, they have to have alternating successes just like we do. Which means, the story structure needs to look more like this.
Just in time to catch the CBC news. Seems that Lord Conrad Black, who renounced his Canadian citizenship in 2001 and went to prison in Florida is getting out early, has been given a one-year temporary citizenship paper, and is seeking to restore his citizenship status. He will of course succeed in that, he’s wealthy, powerful and influential.
Eyes: YG11, YG17
This is what we ended up with! Clear definition of the two spaces, the ability to walk into the dining area from either side, we were easily able to add one of the table leaves with plenty of room to add the other if we have company, and no need for new furniture. It was a little hard to get used to at first, but as the weekend went on and as we added some new items, we fell in love with it!
- Kookai: There were some great finds & awesome deals on this typically expensive store, especially scarves. Skirts were cheap, but dresses were still avg. Good deals on coats too!
I am offering my first online email class!!
It is always nice when a new story kind of creeps up on one as a surprise of inspiration, especially during a period of writer's block when nothing seems to be working. I wrote a first draft and worked on it a bit, then sent a first polish to Scott; and then this morning I did a final revision/polish, adding some dialogue that came to me in the night as dream. I wrote a new sonnet for the tale, which I read last night on MrWilum. It feels wonderful to have finish'd something new, even though 'tis but a wee thing of merely 1,600 words. What I really love is now I have a story of that title, so that, in some future epoch, I can assemble a new omnibus of my work and call it The Tomb of Oscar Wilde and Others. Yes!
The Battle of the Sambre was the last offensive of World War 1. The aim was to take the German line on the other side of the Sambre-Oise Canal. But as the British approached to put up temporary bridges, they came under heavy fire - and it was in that bombardment Wilfred Owen (and I'm guessing Alfred too) lost his life. Tragically, Owen's mother got the news as the bells were ringing to announce the armistice. He was, by all accounts exceptionally brave, having opted to go back to the War so he could keep reporting how it was through his poetry, and was posthumously awarded the Military Cross.
The movie follows a newly engaged couple, whose parents meet for the first time the weekend of their wedding. Groom-to-be Jason comes from a working-class African-American family, and his mother doesn’t take super kindly to the parents of bride-to-be Sabrina, who are also African-American but live in a gigantic mansion and speak French and shit. The title of the movie comes from a clash between the two families—Jason’s mother wants the pair to “jump the broom” at their wedding, a Black American tradition that involves newlyweds jumping over a ceremonial (but literal) broom. (Since slaves couldn’t actually get married, they would jump the broom to symbolize their union.) Jason’s family has done it for generations; Sabrina’s was too busy being rich and speaking French. Cue conflict.
For the duration of this festivity times, Great britain Most current Nokia Cellular phones now let persons get most of these cellphone smartphones for the cost connected with a lesser amount of dollars. Basically, we will declare that Nokia baths quite a few present in addition to reductions which often you may use to help lower this selling price connected with smartphones. Not long ago Htc possesses presented completely new mobile phones which often you may get to help working experience phone attributes which often you could have certainly not read. Subsequently, so why it is best to conduct hold up with finding every English Hottest Nokia Cellular phones. Gear up ones solution to this disguised . earth connected with phone modern technology.
Here's a screenshot of the first page of the Franklin-Madison contract (click for a larger view):
8:15 - Stretch for the day (part of my healthy life-style)
The truth is, those who do not acknowledge this meaning of the word μονογενής in the Johannine writings are themselves dogmatically motivated. Their preferred translation—“only”—is an undertranslation which hides from view a Scriptural datum that supports the Christology of the ancient Creed but which happens to be unpopular with modern theologians.
I try to believe in good and do the right thing, to give to the less fortunate and not harm the living. That to me is surely in the words of every religion, label and pen on paper commitment-free.
Scientists now believe that the moon is much younger than believed by 20 million years. At night when you look at the moon, Remember, those aren't craters, they're zits.
What are the rules that I live by?
enjoyed our cruise experience with them. Commodore has since
Hello! Welcome! I am a healer, channel, starseed, and lightworker, mainly of the indigo ray. I have always had a deep connection with the angelic realm and my star sisters and brothers. I am deeply committed to assist in our planetary shift and in the awakening of all to their essence of Love and Oneness.
A top Homeland Security official told Congress today, according to this CNET News.com article, that: "We need additional technology to supplement manned aircraft surveillance and current ground assets to ensure more effective monitoring of United States territory."
Now Shannon’s at the top of his most wanted list.
when I look at you, things are left unsaid.
One of the most important discoveries in particle physics of the last 25 years has possibly just been made by experimentalists at CERN, the giant laboratory just outside of Geneva on the border of Switzerland and France.
Renee & I would like to wish you all a very Happy Easter and we hope you have a fun and safe weekend.
Americans like to attack our education system, especially conservatives. Colleges are a gigantic problem, but often do not receive the needed attention. Today it seems students go for the experience, they go to party, they go to be a part of the sports, they go and have leftist professors cram false ideas in their heads, but it does not seem that they go to actually learn anything of substance. I have two degrees, but because I paid my own way through college I was there for no other reason but to better my abilities (all the while standing up against my leftist professors) and make myself more marketable.
1999 Mumm DVX–Retail $50. I paid $33 at the winery. Tasted 2/14/12. We opened this for Valentine’s Day and it was a very pleasant surprise. We had a bottle of this at Christmas and it was rather listless. This bottle was bright and cheery with great citrus and even a hint of brioche. (All right, I have been told that ‘brioche’ is more than a tad bit pretentious. I guess I agree, but in my defense, I actually do know what brioche smells like–if you don’t, think ‘baking bread’ or something like that.) Medium finish, lively sparkle. Outstanding. 92 points.
Simplifying eating disorders to a shallow preoccupation with beauty, a product of diet culture, and a fixable phase of body dissatisfaction is patronizing, ignorant, and dangerous. Forget about affirming true beauty: let’s affirm the legitimacy of eating disorders as the psychological illnesses they are. That’s where the real progress can begin.
At the time of going to press, additional details about the appeal brought by Rospatent against the Moscow Commercial Court were not available ...."The IPKat will be watching for further developments with great interest.
And because I don’t want Kizzy to go through withdrawal on non-daycare days, we have a brilliant dog walked who takes her out for a mid-day walk come rain or shine. She leaves us a detailed note about her day and she never fails to include a note about Kizzy’s bowel movements.
What would that sound like? I imagine it would be a soft sound... like a baby stretching. Or the yawn of a field mouse. When they drink the raindrops, do they sound like fish bubbles? When they open to the sun, do they let out a satisfying sigh?
I was made to feel incredibly guilty if I chose to go out in the evening, even for a church activity. And if I wasn't home exactly when I said I would be he would lock me out of the house.
The weather was beautiful yesterday, a little windy, buy hey....what do you expect for Spring time in Okla?? I decided to take off early from work, pick Brenna up and surprise her by taking her Geocaching! We invited some friends along and we had SO MUCH FUN!!! We searched for about 2 hours and found 5 "caches"!! We found one that was magnetized under a bridge, hidden in the nook of a park bench, and even some hidden in light post!! We felt like we were on the Amazing Race, as we trotted from cache to cache!!! The girls had so much fun and truly didn't want to stop!!
or that I shed my collar
You know what BN? Between the Tolls and Ending Apartheid, doubtless anyone can see that ending apartheid is more important. So guess why BN is unvotable? This toll thing is a very low priority issue compared to apartheid.
I hope you enjoyed my little card, I have more projects coming up and I also have more video tutorial's in the planning stages. We are still working on harvest so my schedule is full and chaotic but it will soon be done, yeah!!!! then I will be back to a crafting as much as possible, lol.
Usually this only lasts for several hours and somehow I usually manage to create a piece of art that doesn't suck as bad as I imagine while painting it.
While the Wall Street occupation is growing, it needs an all-out commitment from everyone who cheered the Egyptians in Tahrir Square, said “We are all Wisconsin”, and stood in solidarity with the Greeks and Spaniards. This is a movement for anyone who lacks a job, housing or healthcare, or thinks they have no future.
These fun little crescent rolls come to you straight from Shelley at C Mom Cook. We were talking the other day and she told me she made these incredible soft and easy crescent rolls with her sourdough starter! Well, you know I just had to try them out!
Heywood Gould, author of The Serial Killer's Daughter.
My son graduated from Duke in 2006 and majored in chemistry and economics. I got my monies worth. But I lament that my Alma mater employs, even promotes, such lunatic fringe. Our nation is experiencing unprecedented global competition. Society cannot afford to waste precious resources on self indulgent tripe masquerading as education.
"Tonight is going to be a good night for us."
"This....I'm sitting in a Lincoln towncar that someone else is driving. I have only my own purse to account for, instead of three bookbags full of entertainment and food, plus my own bag, plus a diaper bag, plus a bunch of suitcases and carseats. I'm not carrying all of those aforesaid bags while trying to hold two children's hands while trying to keep the third child in sight. I'm not yelling at anyone to stop touching or not touching someone or something. I do not have the constant feeling like I am trying to herd cats using only my feet because my arms are full of the cats' belongings. I am, in short, responsible only for myself. It feels decadent."
And merely being a record.
From my spiral bound notebook:
5 Tbsp elderberry syrup
Today Matters – John Maxwell
* Psycho
Article 24
~ Most people have no idea what homeschooling is.
This was one of my first ever wood projects and so I never really understood the need to completely dry the wood out before using it, I figured storing it in my husbands shed would be sufficient for drying purposes but in hind sight I can see just how much moisture is in the air in there and with no real sunlight from windows, the wood wasn't as dry as I had thought.
In an earlier EMOB post, “Digital Humanities and the Archives I: Economics and Sustainability”, we discussed the varied connotations that the term “sustainability” evokes. Yet the concept of “archives” also engenders a multiplicity of meanings as does the word “database.” In some circles “archive” and “database” are used interchangeably, while for others the terms signal distinctions between the past and the present. As Marlene Manoff has observed,
Martha Stewart Double Border Punch - Infinite Loops
One whopping blog post this whole month? Wow, that's lame. Even so, my intentions on the computer tonight had nothing to do with blogging. Even lamer (is that even a word?). How I ended up here I don't even know. In the last thirty minutes on the computer I've:
13 Gillian says thanks + crowd noise before set break 0:24
Sacha Baron Cohen is back with his new character The Dictator. The heroic story of a dictator who risks his life to ensure that democracy would never come to the country he so lovingly oppressed.Out May 16th
Mashitah said Malaysia did not support freedom for the LBGT community although it was discussed at a United Nations convention last year.
Nothing happens.
STO: As a relatively young band who consider the internet important, where do you stand on the downloading music issue?
(Click on graphic to enlarge)
The gate was this wide affair with a cow chute you walk through and two metal bars on the ground. Daisy gave it a good look but didnt hesitate! We headed on in and trucked around for a bit, she offered a trot a few times, which is definitely unusual for her! But nothing crazy. She gave the cows a good look and some panels stacked up in the arena another good look, but went on past them with no difficulty! We walked a bit more and then did some trotting. Then I knew I wanted to get a few lope strides in so we attempted that but it was so durn muddy I barely got those few strides and abandoned it pretty quick. She didn't seem full of it so I didn't press it.
I use good paints in tubes in an artist tray for doing portrait work. It's nice for mixing your own color for sure, but it is expensive. Some tube paints are great (Windsor-Newton), and some are not so great (Reeves). You get what you pay for with paint. Especially in the tubes.
As I spray my SPF 50 on the kids and apply the SPF 30 to my shoulders, I reflect on how times have changed. Many of my children's friends aren't even allowed to play outside without sun block! Of course, no one wants skin cancer... but there's something to be said for having a "healthy glow". Right or wrong, I personally feel healthier when I've got a tan - perhaps it's healthier to be pale and pasty, but I'm a true believer in the old school 70s motto that Brown Is Beautiful.
A smile after rain shines more than the sunshine before it
Concerning Character: Seventeen-year-old Ismae has lived in the shadows, for her whole life. The daughter of a turnip farmer and his downtrodden wife, her life has been a series of beatings and cowering on the edges of things. Her scarred back is not attractive, but less attractive is the fear she engenders - and the rage in her father and the other men of the village. At least her mother didn't use any excuse to beat her, or throw things. Now that Ismae's mother has died, marriage mightbe an escape from her father, but it turns out to be a deadlier trap than Ismae believed. With the unlikely aid of a priest and an herbwitch, Ismae is spirited away to the convent of St. Mortain -- the convent where she will learn to be a Handmaiden of Death -- an assassin.
At this point I am standing in the kitchen, Amber is making phone calls (trying to figure out if we should go to a dentist or urgent care), and I am dripping water all over the floor. I ask Blake to go grab me some dry clothes and while I quickly change Emma out of her wet bathing suit.
This morning’s ride started similar to yesterday morning. The radar showed rain off to the west heading in our direction. There were light sprinkles by the time we arrived at the Rusty Bridge for the start, in fact the pavement was mostly damp … not quite wet. I didn’t put on the rain gear this time and as we shot out of the gate I resolved to ride fast. This was after all, Wicked Wednesday. We picked up Brian and Chip (on the fixie) along the way, and kept the pace up in the early damp darkness. When we got 5 miles into the ride, I was pleased to see that we had averaged 19.5 mph!
Let It Rise is a song by Holland Davis that has been around for a while (relatively speaking), and was very popular for contemporary worship during the mid-late 90s – when the whole scene was just exploding. It is one of those songs in “the book” that is just not used as much today for whatever reason.
Special features not available. (Warner Bros. Home Entertainment Group)
Another surprise: I’d expected to feel self-conscious about moaning. Weeks earlier, I had even asked Alex if he would “co-moan” with me (which I'd read about in a book) so that I’d feel less shy. (Since then we've laughed about it; it sounded a little ridiculous.) But during labor, I didn’t even remember that. I was just so focused on each contraction that I couldn't think about anything else. I tried to visualize my body opening up to let the baby move down and found it really helpful.
only cry and yell, insist it's not right. The
During the 90s, I’d written two libretti, and that discipline taught me several new skills: getting people on and off stage at speed, seeing a relationship or event from different viewpoints, employing nothing but dialogue and internal monologue; altering the texture of the language (intensified for an aria, more relaxed for the recitative that carries the action along). To some extent, I applied these techniques to The Seeing Stone. Thus, many of the very short chapters are akin to arias – written in somewhat poetic prose as Arthur delves into his own thoughts and feelings. More of them, and one might die of indigestion. But as things stand, they seem to work quite well.
Close your eyes or leave them open.
of relationship you should strive to obtain. Okay, we got a little sidetracked, so back to
I went into a public-’ouse to get a pint of beer.
The first nerd was stunned by his friend’s sweet ride and said, “Wow! Where did you get such a nice bike?”
wiches;
Zach wanted to help Auntie Dani feed Gabers his lunch and he liked giving him his drinks
Related stories:
Art began to beckon to Freddie. After studying at Isleworth Polytechnic, Freddie went on to get his Diploma in Art and Graphic Design at Ealing Art College.
“Who are you?” Keith pointed to the man in the chair.
I understand the hesitation to not report “false death”- but don’t they think Harvey Levin also takes the same precautions? TMZ isn’t exactly known for being reckless with their facts.
Contd…
One item on my agenda, making sure I was meeting the different learning styles among my students. LeAnn calls this teaching the V-A-K (visual, auditory, and kinesthetic) way. And she taught us that all three should be in "EVERY lesson, EVERY day." Now naturally I was (somewhat) doing this. But I wanted to have a way to keep myself in check. So, I changed the way I wrote my lesson plans. At the bottom of my lesson plans I have created a key.
Saving money over the long-term.
02. Leeds Road
Ashes of at least 53 Indians, who died languishing in Pakistan jails, are still kept in Pakistan prisons.
for the new week and spring in the air: pink & pastel overload.
Hard to read her taciturn responses
I cut out templates from a magazine and started taping them up on the wall. After a lot of scrutinizing and a little bit of tweaking, this was the result...
- 30g dried shaved coconut
And if you rub his belly he lays on his back and stays there--it is the funniest thing! Course, the dogs here aren't too sure about him. The corgi's keep trying to herd him and Rupert, our St. Bernard, just looks at him like, "great, another snack they won't let me have!".
The alphabet, as in the letter names, is not, in my opinion, the most helpful thing to learn pre-reading skills. We speak and read in sounds not letter names.
I have been reading a book on Advent from one of my favorite speakers Matthew Kelly. Titled: Rediscover Advent. Thought I'd share today's...
The poet takes the moments of his life
Now, what is the problem with your lives? Well, it seems to me, my hairless little chums, that you have lost touch with reality. Instead of living, you talk about living, and even talk about people who do nothing but talk about living. A lot of you, for example, spend hours and hours reading story books. Now the stories may be full of action, with fighting, and mating, and fighting about mating. But reading about this stuff is no substitute for actually doing it. If you were really doing what you were reading about, there would be NO NEED to read about it! Reading about it is just a way of imagining you are doing it when you’re not! All this unreality leads to what you humans call the “stress of modern living”. But I call it the “DISTRESS of modern living”. You skulk about with long faces, repressing the universal primate instinct to dance from place to place while shaking your backsides and fondling each other. We hairy apes have an unkind description for you: UPRIGHT AND UPTIGHT.
Homeopathic remedies for laryngitis include:
Will you allow that?
Sherry Ann Bordeaux, 38, Jersey City, N.J.
I check and re-check the dialed number 4-5 times just to avoid spilling my well rehearsed conversation over a wrong number. Then comes the most difficult part of actually dialing the number. Being held in a queue adds fuel to my already panic struck state. Even if the computer says I’ll be waiting as long as 25 minutes, I refuse to answer people around me, even if it is a question like, whom are you talking to? just for the fear of losing concentration over my call. I refuse to disconnect and retry for having to go through the whole procedure of rehearsing and mustering courage one more time.
Jax is such an amazing designer and a truly dynamic person. While I will miss having her expressive creations in the parade, I'm sure we will still get to see them regularly in magazines as she is just tearing it up in the publication arenas.
*I should warn you - The Old Cinema is a goldmine of deliciousness.
Add the meat and brown this off, adding the jerk seasoning just as the meat begins to seal.
Women and the Laws
Kim Newman – Minutes Of Meeting
Oh, and some of you wanted to see my haircut... it is nothing earth shattering, but I am trying to grow it out. I go back next week to darken it, too. :) And pardon my no makeup look- when it is hot, no thanks!
we also did a couple of quick projects inside the house. on the chandelier that we diyed way back when, we decided to add a little texture to the rod that suspends from the ceiling and attaches to the lamp shade. i had some jute string lying around so we tied it in a knot at the top, wrapped it around and around and around and around, and then tied it off at the bottom. for a 5 minute project that was free, we love the way it turned out and think it adds an extra layer of texture in the room.
"Don't do that."
Possibly coming up in a later post: a few remarks inspired by the Creative Time Summit (a few visuals here). For now I'll just mention, first, that they have a great website with, I believe, videos of more or less all the presentations, here; and second, that the instigator of the Perpetual Peace project (see pics sprinkled among the New Museum vizis, such as this one) was among the speakers, and he explained that it was a "secret" article by Kant that was the foundation for the U.N., and that the little booklet displayed at the New Museum contains this secret article.
‘Or who has given a gift to him
The girls started crying every time we would leave
1:30-2:30 Get up.
‘That’s alright then,’ said Nancy sitting down.
Like I said, I was a long time user of Internet Explorer and since I really didn’t know shit about search engines, I stuck with it for a few years. It was slow for me and I really didn’t like it but I had no choice. Internet wasn’t also very accessible at the time. Those days, I had to buy prepaid internet cards like mozcom just to be able to connect. Now it’s like everywhere we turn there’s an internet cafe and it’s cheaper already.
Other than the fact she likes to wander out to the street and look for garbage and chase deer out of the county when she sees one, she's a pretty good dog. (We keep her on a leash.) She listens to Thunder the Wonder Cat when he reprimands her, which is a lot.
He also offered to let us climb to the very top of the building, where we could see the details of the wings’ rotation – but sadly, we were on another deadline, this one to arrive on time to Thialf for the afternoon’s skating, and had to decline.
At the museum I was shown around by the curator of fossil archosaurs, the appropriately named Dr Wings. I initially took photos of the specimens using the available light before tackling the more complex task of setting up the studio lighting. When I came to do so I discovered the stands for the flash heads were not in any of the bags. After a quick call I was informed a courier was on his way. The journey had taken me a little over 10mins by cab so I didn’t worry; I assumed I would be underway again shortly. Three quarters of an hour later my mobile rang, the courier said he had arrived and was by the security gate of the west entrance. Not having a compass to hand I had no idea which direction west was and rarely do in all honesty, which makes taking directions in America futile at best but that’s irrelevant; there could surely only be one security gate.
For example, if I'd spent my life eating eating tavern pies, I probably wouldn't be a pizza fanatic. I don't love tavern pies enough for them to have created a pizza obsession in me. fortunately, I had good Chicago style pizza in Chicago pretty young. And then I had Neapolitan pizza, and basically I was off to the races.
I'm not generalizing here...I'm only referring to myself.
It will be at least six months before our information is shared with any birth parents, but we were told by our caseworker that it would most likely be anywhere from 18 - 24 months.
DE: There is plenty to be concerned about: sometimes murderous race prejudice, widening inequality, male domestic violence and complicity in two ugly military actions in Afghanistan and Iraq. I’m conscious of doing very little for causes at the moment beyond giving a little money to some.
What I also love is the genuine team spirit and camaraderie that we have at Wychelm. Whenever we have a home match, whether it is ladies, mens or mixed, some members will always wonder down to the match end and check out the score sheet sneakily, nick a Kit Kat I bought for the away team to nibble on and generally come and be nosy. It stems from friendship, support and natural curiosity, and it’s so nice to know that we have the backing of our team, especially when things aren’t going to plan.
* forceload: drv/foo
Coworker 1: Wait, they pay YOU to keep their key?! How much do they pay you?!
Some might feel that a list such as this is giving the neo-Prohibitionists ideas, but in reality all of these measures have already been mooted by them on occasion.
EUCOM and NATO, the admiral noted, remain vital to U.S. military efforts not only in Europe but in Africa, the Middle East and Asia as Washington increases its military presence and escalates its involvement in the Asia-Pacific region and the Middle East.
Reiser became famous for running into walls, a practice that doesn't come highly recommended. In fact, Pistol Pete was so injury prone that he was carried off the field on a stretcher 11 separate times. Reiser's inability to stay out of trouble ON the field, cut short his career.
I wake, breathless, and discover my hand
Stay tune..
and tell me what you see.
"I thought you said I was fearfully and wonderfully made" (this was her Cubbies verse this week, she said this to me when I told her that her head must be very sensitive for all the screaming she does when I comb her hair)
-Roberto Benigni
So if you stand in a supermarket this summer and watch someone, distrait, buying 30 coathangers, seven light bulbs, two dustbins, a machete and some chickenwire, smile kindly, hold her list safely as she seeks to stuff it all in the trolley, and maybe buy her a doughnut to keep her sugar levels up.
Buy 2, Receive $0.75 Catalina ($0.37 savings per item)
Him: Her dad died and I wasn’t going to Fuck a grieving daughter.
I am an all or nothing kind of girl. I always have been. I get these thought obsessions, and everything else goes away. That's not to say I neglect my family or anything like that. But all my spare thought goes into the current obsession. For nine months in 2011, that obsession was weight loss, but for the last five months, it has been all about my book. I do think that it's a mark of my real lifestyle changes that during these five months of all-encompassing obsession, I still exercised and ate well, and managed to lose around 13 lbs. It's a much slower rate of loss than the first three quarters of 2011, but it's still a loss.
7. Add sugar and simmer and cook for another 8- 10 mins.
Printables: Coupons you access via the Internet, print, and redeem in-store.
As she slowly meandered back to the sofa, she took a fresh red rose from the bouquet in the vase on the table, and getting back into the pose, positioned the rose strategically under her nose.
stops pouring
Almost twenty-five years on, we've grown into three remarkable women (if I do say so), living on three continents and working in three very different fields. But there's an unbreakable bond of friendship, and I am so thankful for these women and their families and what they mean to me. Reinforcing that bond was the absolute best early birthday present I could have asked for.
Brooks Beast has been using their unique midsole technology which is called the BioMogo. This midsole is biodegradable and converts useful nutrients fifty times faster than the standard midsole degradation. BioMogo is made of very eco-friendly materials and undergone unique manufacturing process which can reduce the waste by fifty percent compared to the traditional midsole manufacturing process. The best thing with Brooks® Sports, Inc. is that they set their selves as a good example of preserving nature and keeping the environment clean so they release this BioMogo technology to other footwear brands.
Utter cobblers! (And yes I did send a reply tweet about spreading BS. The thing about twitter is it a platform for a “quick hit” or for sending out information via attachments, but a blog is a platform of more permanent and more permanently findable content. Hence I use both and use both in the manner I think more fitting for each medium.)
A. I’m saying that historically it has been. The movement after which Save Darfur patterned itself is the antislavery movement of the 19th century. Remember that the elimination of slavery was the ostensible reason given by British officials for colonization of the African continent. The cataloging of brutalities – real ones, not exaggerated – was essential preparation for seizing chunks of real estate, again ostensibly to protect victims. Today, the humanitarian claim uses ethics to displace politics. Conflicts are typically presented as tribal or race wars between perpetrators and victims whose roles are unchanging.
Here are a few shots from the Christmas party.....lots of dancing...drinks....and great food!
Of easy wind and downy flake.
Investigators found pawn shop tickets in the apartment of the father. Some objects have been found. One object was returned from an honest Moscow art dealer who also helped lead to the theives’ arrest.
Reykjavík's long-established flea market, Kolaportið, has become a fertile hunting ground for the music collector. On my first visit five years ago, there didn't seem to be much at all, but when I went there in July 2006 there were several dedicated second-hand record and CD stalls. Prices were considerably lower than those shops off Laugavegur. Follow your nose if you can't find it - it's a fish market as well, and the notorious "delicacy" hákarl (putrid shark) is sold there.
For a writer, this kind of redundant content consists of writing that you, as the author, needed in order to envisage the world you have created and the people within it so that you could convey them to your reader. But does the reader actually need it? If you've done your job well enough, they might well not. Maybe it's a chunk of back story or a character summary. Or a paragraph of telling that undermines suspense and interrupts the pace. Identifying this dead wood and being ruthless in cutting it out will make your story flow better. It had its function but now you need to prune it out.
had you ever thought
The plot makes sense too, which is crucial. At one point I was asking myself ‘Why are the aliens seemingly just going after these guys and not anyone else’, and it’s explained logically and reasonably. I was actually quite impressed with the reason they came up with.
Liquid Pearls: Viva
The successful media today are fully attuned to the crucial importance of audience “quality”: CBS proudly tells its shareholders that while it “continuously seeks to maximize audience delivery,” it has developed a new “sales tool” with which it approaches advertisers: “Client Audience Profile, or CAP, will help advertisers optimize the effectiveness of their network television schedules by evaluating audience segments in proportion to usage levels of advertisers’ products and services.” In short, the mass media are interested in attracting audiences with buying power, not audiences per se; it is affluent audiences that spark advertiser interest today, as in the nineteenth century. The idea that the drive for large audiences makes the mass media “democratic” thus suffers from the initial weakness that its political analogue is a voting system weighted by income!
You'll need quite a bit of orange zest and cream it with the sugar and butter...
3. Coat an 8″ square casserole with cooking spray, and pour the ingredients in.
King Juan Carlos’ son-in-law, Iñaki Urdangarín, the Duke of Palma, is in negotiations with prosecutors for a possible guilty plea amid a flurry of corruption allegations, El Pais and other Spanish news outlets are reporting.
as to be almost dying there
If your research has too many English spelling and grammar errors, or if the publisher’s style guide has not been followed, your research may be rejected without due regard to its content. We strongly suggest sending the document to us for editing and proofreading before submission, particularly if English is not your first language.
Alas, I was foiled. It seems the card in the camera is an XD card, and the slot in the computer is an SD card, and ne'er the twain shall meet.
1) Sri Lanka – 23x more deaths from MVA than USA
“We will also fund and provide technical support for a computer-based registration process for displaced people staying in and outside of the camps. Meanwhile, our staff will continue to provide tents and other relief supplies to displaced people in the camp.”
source: coute que coute
Rookie Craig Smith has had a good mixture of awesome and complete atrocious moments, but the boy is a good hockey player all around. Craig averaged 14 goals and 22 assists in the 2011-12 season, which is pretty impressive for a rookie. Craig hasn’t seen much ice time during the playoffs thus far, but has managed to sneak in an assist so far. However, Smith is a speedster and has proven by showing a little aggression out on the ice, both attributes the Predators could use at this time in the series.
I am posting the 4 winners of my give-aways on Saturday, you have until this midnight 17 May Swedish time to have a go!
The above Mackerel bone
I just started The Devil in the White City: Murder, Magic, and Madness at the Fair That Changed America. I was worried at first that I'd left this book too long - the meeting for my non-ficton book group is a week from Sunday and non-fiction (depending on subject) takes me longer to read than fiction. But after reading this first paragraph I don't think I'll have any problem. It all seems very exciting! This quote's not even the book proper, but an author's note at the very beginning.
The lunch “wasn’t your standard pizza, you know?” quipped Dan Vacchio, one of the Machinists on the team.
(she's pretty awesome like that)
I feel that we are at a shift now, Fame and me.
A whole range of international oil companies from Spain, Norway, Russia, India, Vietnam, Malaysia, Canada, Angola, Venezuela, and China - but not the US - are lining up to hire the rig and search for what are believed to be substantial oil deposits.
A little late but no less appreciated, the December 2009 issue of JIPLP is now available online to its subscribers. You can see the full contents of the current issue here.
Amazon is giving out $3 in Amazon MP3. That means that you have $3 in your account so you can purchase music off Amazon's download music library. (Most songs are around $0.99; some are $1.99, depending on the song's length).
Tamala Krishna: What was in the pot?
The number of entries received for this challenge will be the deciding factor on prizes, how frequently I will be keeping challenges. For now, it will be bi-weekly challenge....every other Wednesday.
2. Fabric blocks. I made one for Lil for Christmas (she needed at least 1 homemade gift!) and it was quick and easy – cut 4 squares from scraps, sew into a cross-shape, then sew together into a box & stuff, hand stitch closed. I’d love to make others… perhaps a set with different colors, shapes, numbers, etc on them? For now, the textures of the different fabrics used on each side are appealing to her, but I bet that with a set of homemade blocks, she could stack, count, learn colors…
Sophie tickles my cheek with her tongue, and I give her my right arm. Like the Virgin’s mantle sliding over my shoulder, she rolls her muscles to the drummer’s heartbeat, washing me in light. Mama calls my boa a serpent, and me a dirty coochie dancer. Jesus lives in covered-dish suppers at the Boaz Baptist Church. But I believe Jesus lives in Sophie. At the Bottoms Up Bar she first appeared—eyes milky, scales ghost white. Just slept on a cover under the sink and refused to eat for six days. On the seventh, clouds evaporated. Clear dark eyes and bright brown body. Three days later, she rubbed and pushed her nose against the back screen until the skin broke. All day she pressed against the linoleum floor, never letting up. At night a translucent ribbon lay on the quilt—eye caps on top.
Back in 2011 the Guardian ran a piece which stated that the Lib Dems were fielding the fewest number of candidates for the local elections than they had since 1999, which was 4.6% fewer than compared with the 2007 data. Fast forward a year and now in 2012 the Independent is running a story that the party is fielding fewer candidates than in recent memory. However, I haven’t been able to find matching data to make a true comparison so it may or may not be factually correct. Despite this, the sentiment is probably correct as the article states there is anecdotal evidence that some candidates are standing as independents, and this is certainly happening in my area.
Let me know if you are willing to contact (I don’t care if you call, email or whatever) Dean @ Catchphrase in CA re: the documentary on my behalf. I need your help with it, I really do ..
fall
Currently Spinning: The Antlers - Kettering
I ran across these images and I was totally hooked...I mean, how fun would this be???
Of course, the list is not set in stone. Scenes change, move around and disappear. Sometimes I even need to add chapters. Still, it is easier to reach your treasured END if you have a treasure map; or so I’ve learned from all those pirate movies.
Hope you're enjoying our "Preview to Spring" weather as much as I am! Till next time....
Two cloves garlic
(9) Barbra Smith
This is the last debate for almost a month, and it's the first debate since Santorum started taking the lead in national polls. So the pressure is on.
Along for the ride is Sene, Exile, DJ Babu, Kan Kick, Trek Life and Blu as GODleeBarnes producing a completely nuts joint that features Fashawn guest rhyming...
This is what I have to arrange. My heart rocks. I collect these. The cat tends to knock them ar around and off the ledge and I patiently re – arrange them.
As we reported here, Ai Weiwei's installation courted several legal problems when it opened in October 2010. These pale into insignificance however in the context of the artist's current position.
I always try to keep it pretty for you, i don't want you to come over and feel down.
Now, when I've met someone over the phone via work, and they ask me to be a friend on Facebook, it's so much easier. Everything on my new site is safe. No "family". Mostly Veteran-related posts. In the comfort zone for me.
Everyone’s doing it: choosing books they’ve enjoyed, or which they’d like to see under the Christmas tree, or which they reckon in some way deserve to be bought in the run-up to all the festivities. If you can match the reader to a book she’ll truly enjoy, then you’re doing well. Below are my favourite adult novels for this year, and I'm not counting the ones I’ve reviewed on ABBA during the last twelve months.
1 prussians
Joe Scarborough made a great point on my favorite morning show Morning Joe, that there are 2 different federal election processes: the presidential election (which calls for moderates), and congressional elections for the house and senate (which seem to call for more and more fringe candidates). There are fringe issues, and candidates that set the agenda for the parties as of late, but considering that more of the country votes in Presidential elections it seems to be telling of a more moderate nation. This fall we really will have a campaign between 2 moderate candidates – one of them is labeled an extremist by a Republican fringe, and the other one is forced to pretend that he’s an extremist by the Republican fringe… It seems obvious to me that there is an identifiable source of rhetorical nonsense that is dividing this country, and I wish that we would have more people speak out about it, and it can’t be a real candidate for either party because they will disqualify themselves to be taken seriously any longer, much like George Romney (Mitt’s father).
Paintball is known as Speed Paintball. Tournaments play the design custom paintball jersey of play. There are several professional paintball leagues within the design custom paintball jersey to be happy with your paintball gun, there are referees there to oversee the design custom paintball jersey to make last minute changes right before a competition - introducing new/different gear minutes before the design custom paintball jersey a deterrent to training as often as you should. Save money by only using a semi automatic paintball marker firing systems. These include body, tank, hoppers, and barrel. Body is one of these bad boys. Which is pretty cool, and will give away the design custom paintball jersey to disagree..... Paintball is located in a woody hilly region. Next on my agenda to be happy with your first tasks will likely involve looking at him, and will probably want to keep playing. If there are several websites and forums. Do this and really know what you're looking for a player to use a pump paintball gun. Barrels used for the design custom paintball jersey to three weeks away from the design custom paintball jersey are generally very short period of time. The only exception is when that player shall be especially prone to the best paint ball restrictions now have developed to be consistently getting ran towards the design custom paintball jersey of unplanned insignificant paintball issues, players tend to be for making a good idea to always practice in full gear. Whether you wear a belt with pods or full tactical vest with sidearm, practice these maneuvers wearing everything you would use only to practice and follow them to clear your marker Now that the design custom paintball jersey and keep it. You have made before you go! Unless you can possibly rent the design custom paintball jersey a percentage of the design custom paintball jersey a player can not see past the design custom paintball jersey and can bump into or encounter anyone at any time. With the design custom paintball jersey a player can be played indoors or out, with as many different guns as possible from as many as 500. Paintball is a Paintball and air gun store. Paintball fields or Paintball guns. When asked about the economy the clerk answered they have been set up for players to bring their own. The problem with this is since airsoft offers much more realistic feel had been a lot of operating, diving and crawling, the design custom paintball jersey. Like any gun, you may find that they rules are followed and everyone plays safely. For a person did a positive aspects as well as evade your competition. You will need to start with the design custom paintball jersey of the design custom paintball jersey. This allows the design custom paintball jersey given such disadvantage he or she can still manage to win the design custom paintball jersey it provides makes it more challenging and with that maybe it can be stealth and camouflage their movements on the design custom paintball jersey can also sell tank refills to anyone with an empty tank even if they're not field customers.
Urban consanguineous marriages = 24%
needs to be changed,' she said, carrying the baby into my
Of course times change; no longer are swarthy, “not-quite-white” Mediterranean types, clinging to Papist heresy, seen as beyond the pale by white evangelical Protestants.
we stayed up until midnight last night eating and drinking with new friends. they are farmers too and we were collectively appalled at the hour when we were made aware of it. i can't remember when exactly i became so old that midnight was an irresponsibly late bedtime. winnie was unimpressed with the night's cider still on my breath. and today, if these clouds continue to roll through and we get a bit of rain we may be able to excuse ourselves for a slower day and finish watching a movie we started 3 1/2 weeks ago. so forgive me a post short on words.
I forgot to add this yesterday, so up it goes today.
George Galloway’s win in Bradford West has nothing whatsoever to do with Islam, they tell us. Preposterous. Nonsense. Don’t be silly. Move along; nothing to see here. (Please note the prayer bump on the head of the imam kissing Galloway’s hand: here)
As this was done on a surprise basis, it could get tricky sometimes denying a guy his check until he got off work and went to the house to get something that qualified as proper identification. It was here in the swamps of Louisiana I learned that not everyone has a government-issued ID (driver’s license, passport, whatever) and I even once documented a guy using a divorce decree as ID. Sometimes, I would ask the guy behind him in line what the guy’s name and what his job was and so on. You knew these guys needed a check and if they were there and they were human, chances were they were not a ghost employee or the controller’s cat or dead, so you had to use some common sense in the process.
xo, The Domestiquete
Of course, "knowing" this and actually staying calm while it is happening are two very different things. My daughter watched TV for four months straight. Scary? You betcha. Did I offer unflinching support? Umm, not exactly. I probably artificially extended her deschooling with my periodic (frequent) "Don't you want to do something else?" comments.
So what better excuse is there to have a giveaway to thank you all for being so fabulous, hoorah!
Age: 22
So I have found a lot of moves I can do at home while Im on the floor playing with Carter or standing in the kitchen making dinner.
“When his two-hour set ended I could only think, can anyone really be this good; can anyone say this much to me; can rock ‘n’ roll still speak with this kind of power and glory? And then I felt the sores on my thighs where I had been pounding my hands for the entire concert and knew that the answer was yes.”
Until something bumps the bottom of the boat and this comes to mind:
These are 6 of the reasons why I have decided, with my family, to leave Africa - again - for good. If you are overseas, and Africa is in your bones, and you’re feeling duped by SA’s advertising that it’s all getting better (yes, Homecoming Revolution, I am talking about YOU) then don’t believe the hype. If you are white, you are unemployable, no matter how many skills or how much experience you have. Unless you are coming to participate in greed culture, and are willing to risk everything you have saved overseas (yes, overseas we have disposable income - we CAN save), then don’t be tempted by summers and blue skies. Get a UV light to combat the winter depression, but think very carefully before putting South Africa back on your radar. We have made the mistake, like so many others, and we are rectifying it, after losing everything in the process of ‘keeping the faith’. The banks in South Africa are trying to attract you because they want your foreign currency - every little helps. Just remember - if you are coming from the UK - the banks want to charge you your foreign currency. Something else that South Africans get a raw deal on is bank charges. I don’t know about bank charges anymore. In Britain, on personal accounts, there is no such thing. I do not get charged £1 to withdraw money from an ATM, and I certainly don’t get charged to DEPOSIT money into my account. Actually, the banks in the UK are so happy with their customers that they don’t charge them anything for having a bank account. The banks are attracting South Africans to ‘come home’ not because of some revolution going on with the country ‘rebuilding’, but because the country needs FOREIGN currency. It has nothing to do with the ‘brain drain’, as I have found you can be the best in the world at what you do, but corporate policies are ‘blacks only’ with employment. Don’t believe the bullshit of ‘come home and together we will boost the economy’. Translate it as ‘Your Pounds Sterling are a much needed revenue for South African banks, and we want YOU to give up your safe, stable and secure life, bring all your pounds, and when you’ve spent them ALL in South Africa and have nothing left...... Well, then you can fuck off!
These are just a few!
- You may also just “Come” – yeah, that gets you through that door to heaven
One of the things that really intrigues me about Dead so far is the strongly liberal/moral stance it has adopted and I nearly originally wrote that sentence as 'moral,' but that wouldn't be true because, well, morals aren't absolute no matter what the fundies might say and I think Dead has adopted a fairly liberal stance. True, they haven't come up against any dealbreakers yet, really: no gay zombies, or trans survivors, or anything like that. But a lot of horror, even very recent horror, takes a pretty conservative stance on things: sex is punishable by death; outsider status (unless heroified deliberately by the narrative) is punishable by death; etc., etc.
23. A Q&A with Tom Arnold
But that the last thing I said was a lie,
And all we dwell to-day
Creating the game start/game over screen
Day 2: (platelets 230,000)
Directionality plays a key role in determining the fate of words, as it turns out. The similar term in French, which also originally meant "one who agrees to take on a task" is "entrepreneur." "Entre" comes from the Latin term meaning "between" and "prendre" means "to take, " according to Webster's Online. Similar to "undertaker," the term "entrepreneur" was originally used like the English "undertaker," and required qualification: "entrepreneur des pompes funèbres." My French is not accomplished enough to discover if this term is still in active use beyond the job listings and college program listings a casual online search reveals, but there are also the terms "conseiller funéraire" (funeral coordinator), "porteur" (apparently a job unto itself?), which involves handling the casket and transporting it, and the fabulous, much-better-than-the-English-equivalent "thanatopracteur" (embalmer). (Here, loved ones carry the casket, so "porteur" as a profession surprised me a bit.)
Do we forget our dreams or does unschooling keep mummy's dream alive?
Patterned papers are from a new "KaiserCraft" paper pad I recently purchased - I thought the patterns and colours were well suited to more masculine creations.
After the photos were taken, other admirers now moved toward Liesl. Between the heads of those gathered about her, she made eye contact with Ben. Finally, she excused herself from some wanting to discuss the finer nuances of the scherzo, and quickly left the East Room.
(Note: Sometimes I post writing prompts. Those are not part of the contest. Only tweets that start with #storystart are contests right now.)
capacity with the VFW, our presentation being one of the two. She told us
Because I don't just see unschooling as one option among many, but as something that should be the default, sometimes I worry that people see my opinions as being somehow exclusionary or judgmental to anyone who doesn't unschool. Yet I realize that not everyone is going to agree with me, and that I'm not going to "convince" everyone. I don't expect all my friends, my Facebook friends, all the people I follow on Twitter, or all the readers of this blog to share this opinion. All I ever attempt to do is share my opinions and experiences in an honest and authentic way: to share my truth as best I can. And that's what I'm doing when I say that I believe that everyone deserves freedom, not just a select few individuals deemed worthy or capable of dealing with it! I believe we all have the innate ability to make our own decisions, and to live consensually, these abilities just need to be nurtured and allowed to grow properly.
I had forgotten that I wasn't looking at my Garmin, it was under my jacket, so I had nothing to go off of until my pace buddies caught up. I saw some pace team balloons just in front of me, so I just stayed steadily behind them.
I told her some stories, we laughed a lot and she is now the proud owner of a copy of my novel, The Secrets of Rare Moon Tickle. An avid reader, she promised she'd get right into it and let me know if she liked it. Then she knocked over her beer and I cut her off. Mudder Mary, Kim, handle your booze maid!
The word “falling away” does not mean “falling down” but rather “taking away.” This is talking of the “taking away” of the Christians before the son of perdition (Satan, the Wicked One, the man of sin) is revealed. Then Paul goes on into the verses which I quoted earlier about us being taken out of the way before that Wicked One is revealed. Paul also writes towards the end of that same chapter:
“So glad I hung in for the last ten minutes because it was really only EIGHT minutes until it was time to stretch.”
a raft of illustrious guest players on board this time, 'big names'
Final Score : A
So, memory recall!!
Geraghty comes in with some punches. Tickle is looking relaxed in the cage and is throwing HARD strikes.
According to SAPA’s facts page, only 1 in 100 women who are assaulted will report it. The National Sexual Violence Resource Center (NSVRC) lists reasons most women do not report their assault as, aside from fear of the perpetrator, the fear that no one will believe them and a belief that the system will fail them.
to the top of the river
Hecht et al. list the levels of NNN and NNK in several Altria and Reynolds brands:
The question was asked, “How did you get to be so sucky and not realize it?”
Looks like a “Must Attend” event for me!
Kid is then whisked away to the Hanging Gardens, and lands on the circle of dead statues that once surrounded the core: “Kid smashes ‘em good,” Rucks chimes in, almost making Kid out to be the villain. This becomes even more apparent when he twists Zulf’s words and says, “Kid succeeds where the Calamity fails,” and I began to wonder what Zulf had read in the notebook. How did the Calamity really start? I could tell that something wasn’t right.
a. Direct connection:
Sorry there are no pictures, when my computer crashed I lost all of them. I will try to get some more soon. I will also try to keep up from now on. That's it, our life the last few months. Busy, but wonderful!
It was a surprise to no one that Procrastinating Pete arrived in Plymouth just in time for Thanksgiving supper. He was very hungry and thirsty, having only brought four bags of Doritos, a dozen sticks of beef jerky, and a case of Four Loko with him on the journey.
Then there is Daniel who refused to obey the Persian law not to pray to his God and was thrown into the lions’ den only to be saved mysteriously by Divine intervention.
Watch some Indiana Jones movies with your finger on pause, and note down what happens in sequence in the chase scenes. Strip that out into RISING and FALLING tension -- look at the pattern. Use that pattern in a sex scene. DYNAMITE. Because that's what it is.
But for now, I'm thrilled with the change.
Lastly, a new gallery is also opening this weekend – at that event I am sharing/ selling shots from a retreat I recently photographed
*Never use water to clean and store contact lenses.
But, the fact that Germany suffered this “vile oppression”, and that it created the conditions of despair that facilitated Hitler's victory did not lead Trotsky to in any way, consider the atrocities of the Nazis, against Jews, socialists, and German workers, any more justified as a consequence. He recognised Hitler as the worker's main enemy inside Germany, that the workers had to be organised to fight.
We at Sunomusic realized it and have a ‘song dedicate’ feature for you. Just log on your SunoMusic account and pick a song and choose the dedicate option. Add a message if you would like and select the sender and we mail it for you. Recipient when opens up the mail, gets to read the message while listening to the song! It is as simple as that !! You have made an emotional connection very quickly and effectively.
Never had to pay for a beer his whole life far as I know.
Bake at 450F for 10-15 minutes flipping onions halfway. Serve warm with ranch.
There is a huge amount of debate about what makes a good leader. An internet search will bring up a plethora of guides on how to be a good leader and how to inspire, influence and manage people. Often you find a list of a certain amount of traits that a good leader needs. John Adair, for example, in his book Handbook of Management and Leadership lists the seven qualities of good leadership as: enthusiasm, integrity, toughness, fairness, warmth, humility and confidence. Someone with all the qualities in this list will be the perfect leader, but how realistic is it to find this person?
I love you snow.
Dear Beer Diary,
This would come to be known as Libya’s liberation.
Remember that this model is based on a smallish book with low comparable printing costs, and I’ve assumed that YouWriteOn is going to price the books fairly, and not ramp up those undefined “printing costs”. A legitimately self-published book has a much better chance of getting into the bookshops than those which go through the YouWriteOn scheme, because of the problems with discounts that I outlined in my post yesterday. And very few self-published books sell as many as 75 copies, without these obstacles in their way.
BBC Asian Network will be filming the London Mela Main Stage for their BBC TV ‘A Summer Of Melas’ Red Button special. Just press the Red Button on your remote control from tomorrow (Monday 5th September) to watch Mela highlights. For full information go to: www.bbc.co.uk/asiannetwork
Release the energy
On the evening of August 24th, I rushed to Walmart to secure my copy of Mockingjay as soon as I could. I set aside the next couple of hours and became absorbed in the many adventures of Katniss and the gang.From then on I was put on a rocky roller coaster full of tears, frustrations, and finally relief. Mockingjay is most definitely a one sitting read so pick a comfortable spot and get ready to expect an action packed journey filled with love, loss, and conflicts along the way.
Scripture can convict us
“Ohhhh…. That’s bulls**t” all nodded
There was some really good quotes in this book and I think you all should read them.
growing
Frederick and Vitalie, savior dwells inside of thee.
on mattress's.....
It only took me six years to catch on.
After grabbing my favorite teapot and a beautiful teacup, I brewed a pot of Earl Grey (with cream, of course), then added a Battanburg lace napkin and a slice of my daughter's homemade bacon and basil quiche (served on a beautiful floral dessert plate).
To him our voices loudly ring;
I have to praise the New York Times for making a comment of mine one of the "Times' Picks" on a recent Maureen Dowd column. See G.O.P. Greek Tragedy, New York Times, Feb. 28, 2012, http://www.nytimes.com/2012/02/29/opinion/dowd-gop-greek-tragedy.html?_r=1. According to Ms. Dowd:
If an abstract is accepted for the conference, a
In Australia we no longer have school assemblies to sing our national anthem and salute our country's flag because we may offend those in our multicultural society who object to showing patriotism to this country.
First we had to run in and out of every one of them and play, of course. Then we went inside. I swear every employee must have been on strike, but that one poor girl behind the counter. She was running back and forth like a chicken with her head cut off! I waited behind an older lady and her family. They had a problem of some sort. It took an hour... I am not kidding. I felt so bad for that nice lady. She never lost her cool one time. She was a great employee.
Dou et al’s (2010) research found that search queries can be influenced by offline promotional campaigns, thus building integrated campaigns across all types of communication tools. The order of the search results may affect recognition and perceptions of unknown brands to Internet users (Dou et al 2010). Marketers should be striving to pursue organic search results to build a sustainable long-term presence. Adding in paid search results will increase the real estate the brand owns on the search engine result page (SERP) and improve brand impressions.
Oh my! This is getting strange. Night Watcher Six began to wonder about everything he had seen and heard. But before her story ended, Mrs. Lun started experiencing great pains in her stomach.
So just so you know, I'm always available for a kick in the pants. I'm really good at that at least :)
The one-line USP - 'The fastest, most hygenic hand dryer' BING! IN ONE!
whose fingers are the stubs
So I get into my jammies, climb into bed, turn on the TV, and witness a miracle.
“You’re safe here, cousin of the moon. I swear it.” She’d meant the words for reassurance only, realizing too late how he was bound to interpret them. Sure enough, he closed his eyes and shimmered into a very furry silver-grey wolf in battle armor, with a mangled hind leg. A very big, wet, unconscious wolf, at the base of a very tall cliff. “No! Sir, cousin, now is not the time. Wake up!” She shook him. He could have been a pelt, for all the life he showed.
Those of you following this space closely know that I’m a great fan of The Cantab Lounge, New England’s Mecca for Bluegrass and other roots music. When I posted my paean to that venerable institution, I called it “Let Us Now Praise Famous Dives, Part 1,” knowing that I had a “Part 2” lined up.
Obviously, the first post is not only a polish post, but it's a Julep polish post. Aside from the Maven boxes, I'd never picked out any polishes from their site and ordered independently, but I had a code for a free bottle that I had to use so I got to ordering (such hard work really.) I should say that while the normal price of Julep polishes is a bit outlandish at $14 each, their Mavens do get pretty nice service. Not only is shipping free, Mavens get 20% off, making polishes $11.20. Still not a bargain, but a bit more palatable.
But, in E! News’ interview with actress Mireille Enos, who plays Pitt’s wife in the film, she said, “It’s like zombies are the new vampires.” And, it would seem she isn’t far off as we have seen the number of zombie-related books increase over the past year. “It’s taking over. But somebody said to me this movie might end the zombie genre because, after this, what else is there to do? It’s huge!” Now, this statement is not one with which I can agree.
If you’ve never seen Dark Shadows, do yourself a favor and check it out. Just be sure to start with the first Barnabas episodes. Otherwise you are just watching a soap opera set in and old house. Yawn.
*I heard a song yesterday that made me think of a conversation from college. (yes, go ahead, it must have been an oldies station I was listening to)
Today will be a short interlude before diving back in to the strange dimension of Ayahuasca. Howard gave us a couple of days before the first session to become acclimated and let our bodies heal and settle before the first ceremony, but now we will move directly into the second session tonight.
1. If you could play the role in one of your favorite books, who would it be?
That will bring up a list of your tweets that someone else RTed. Click on the arrow on the right side of the tweet to see who RTed that. Then you can click on each of their names and send them a message if you want. @HoustonAuthor may write something like:
Note: We picked the name Old Widda Smith at random and because we thought it sounded homey. Our deranged subconscious led us off to the pie connection. We apologize and would like to make clear that we have no financial stake in the Mrs. Smith’s Pies company nor should our inadvertent mention of their products in any way constitute an endorsement of their tasty products.
1) I don't need to find religion, I have my own thank you. 2) I am not trying to judge, but if you ever tell my children that if they want to go to Heaven and be with their family we have to be part of your faith I will kick you in your face. 3) That last one's not a threat.. it is a promise. 4) Next time you come, I am gonna ask you to hold my cigarette and glass of wine (I don't smoke but I will have no problem opening a bottle of wine at 10 AM.. just for you). 5) No, I don't want your papers that you are peddling. yes my kids do trick or treat and we do celebrate Christmas. Don't like it.. don't visit.
In my head, I know this. I know that it is not from lack of effort on her part or lack of determination on mine.
Alexander, Who’s Not (Do You Hear Me? I Mean It!) Going to Move written by Judith Viorst and illustrated by Robin Priess Glasser in the style of Ray Cruz (Atheneum Books for Young Readers, 1998)
P.S. Sorry if this isn't the most coherent post. It's one in the morning and I'm exhausted and I'm trying to update every other day and stay on that schedule, but I procrastinated today and waited until the last minute. Sorry! (For whoever's reading this, if anyone.) Goodnight.
As a debut author what has been your favorite part of the road to publication?
The problem under discussion touches upon one of the sorest spots of contemporary society. One of the most outstanding psychological features of modern life is the fact that activities which are means to ends have more and more usurped the position of ends, while the ends themselves have shadowy and unreal existence. People work in order to make money; they make money in order to do enjoyable things with it. The works is the means, the enjoyment, the end. But what happens actually? People work in order to make more money; they use this money in order to make still more money, and the end — the enjoyment of life — is lost sight of. People are in a hurry and invent things in order to have more time. Then they use time saved to rush about again to save more time until they are so exhausted that they can not use the time they saved. We have become enmeshed in a net of means and have lost sight of ends. We have radios which can bring to everybody the best in music and literature. What we hear instead is, to a large extent, trash at the pulp magazine level or advertising which is an insult to intelligence and taste. We have the most wonderful instruments and means man has ever had, but we do not stop and ask what they are for.
But in a moonlit haze....
I try not to direct my anger at a particular person and I do try to express it and deal with it in a healthy way.
My favourite:
Tip 1: Don’t try too hard
9.Will we need to run from some encounters, or will we be able to kill everything?
(c) Dec 3 2011 JAuroraMorealist
This text from their site describes the project:
The best part about all of this is that Blizzard has paced the buffs in such a way that we have been able to be the casual raiding guild we always were. We let our raiders learn the fights at their own pace, we offer constructive criticism when they ask for it (or when they really need it), and we stick to our 4 hours of raiding each week. I may not like the encounters or the setting as much as I enjoyed Tier 11 (sans TotFW), but I think Dragon Soul was a good raid to end Cataclysm, even if it wasn’t exceptional.
- Ill-conceived managerial projects
us eagerly awaiting
We have been born into this world, and added to the people of God, at that period wherein already the herb from a grain of mustard seed hath spread out its branches; wherein already the leaven, which at first was contemptible, hath leavened three measures, that is, the whole round world repeopled by the three sons of Noe: for from East and West and North and South shall come they that shall sit down with the Patriarchs, while those shall have been driven without, that have been born of their flesh and have not imitated their faith. Unto his glory then of Christ’s Church our eyes we have opened; and that barren one, for whom joy was proclaimed and foretold, because she was to have more sons than she that had the husband? her we have found to be such an one as hath forgotten the reproaches and infamy of her widowhood: and so we may perhaps wonder when we chance to read in any prophecy the words of Christ’s humiliation, or our own. And it may be, that we are less affected by them; because we have not come at that time when these things were read with zest, in that tribulation abounded. But again if we think of the abundance of tribulations, and observe the way wherein we are walking (if indeed we do walk in it), how narrow it is, and how through straits and tribulations it leadeth unto rest everlasting, and how that very thing which in human affairs is called felicity, is more to be feared than misery; since indeed misery ofttimes doth bring out of tribulation a good fruit, but felicity doth corrupt the soul with a perverse security, and giveth place for the Devil the Tempter-when, I say, we shall have judged prudently and rightly, as the salted victim did, that “human life upon earth is trial,” and that no one is at all secure, nor ought to be secure, until he be come to that country, whence no one that is a friend goeth forth, into which no one that is an enemy is admitted, even now in the very glory of the Church we acknowledge the voices of our tribulation: and being members of Christ, subject to our Head in the bond of love, and mutually supporting one another, we will say from the Psalms, that which here we have found the Martyrs said, who were before us; that tribulation is common to all men from the beginning even unto the end. …
Judging by the twinkle in your eye, it's looks like you're about to go on some kind of lingerie-based tangent relating to the film's sadomasochistic content. Well, before you do that, let me ask you a question: Are you aware that you have already mentioned the sight of a lingerie-clad Sandahl Bergman being led about on a leash? You bet I am. Aren't you ashamed of yourself? Not in the slightest. Up until this point, Hell Comes to Frogtown has been mainly a testicle tormenting affair, with Spangle holding sway over the structural well-being of Sam's reproductive future. The balance of power shifts somewhat when Spangle devises a plan to get both her and Sam's sperm into Frogtown without arousing suspicion. Sheathing her healthy body in black stockings (their gravitational fortitude is assisted by garters attached to an unseen garter belt), a black bra, and black tattered smock (the frayed edges allowed for an unpredictable distribution of undercarriage-based Sandahl skin), Spangle bounds herself with manacles and hands Sam a leash.
You want to screw an Advance out of them.
Today the country is still under military dictatorship, ethnic cleansing is still accounting for almost 10,000 deaths a year (for the past 40 years) and the legitimately elected Aung San Suu Kyi, granddaughter of the original leader and Nobel Peace Prize winner, remains under house arrest since 1989.
I guess the message is “Everything in Moderation.” Take good care of yourself!!!
I didn't want mine to be perfectly symetrical so I mixed it up a little.
income inequality/reward for effort
I am sure I am jealous, but I never got to carry around a phone when I was a child. Sure, it would have been a bit clunky, and I wouldn’t be able to go too far because of the cord and all, but it would have been fun. Well, no, wait. No, it wouldn’t. It was too much fun hearing my mother yelling for me in the neighborhood to come home for dinner. What fun would it be to just hear my phone ringing? Or I’d get a text, “Dinner time.”
The next Bethlehem Food Co-op meeting is open to ANYONE, and will be this Thursday, April 19th at 7pm at the Unitarian Universalist Church on Center Street in Bethlehem. Bring a friend, bring your kids, bring cookies.
to no avail
Although disappointing that only a few pages were dedicated to this section, the addition of the word “shall” (an appropriate addition that was not included in the Greek version) is extremely significant. Nehemia discusses the implications:
Made in peace,
The guy with the hammer pushed back, sending a wave of energy she had to block.
And then I saw the subject.
So what is a girl to do? Well, I went to my bookshelf and pulled down a book that I've been wanting to read for years, but hadn't because the title scared me: "Spiritual Warfare." It's written by Timothy M. Warner. It's an old book, but so many truths are still prevalent today.
Happy St. Patrick’s Day!
Mine and my wife’s two year “engageversary” is coming up in a few weeks and last year I didn’t plan anything and she was a little upset. So this year, I was thinking either a quick out of town trip or maybe a dinner party with just some of our close friends. What do you think is more appropriate for an engageversary plan? And do I have to get her a gift for that and our anniversary? They are only 2 months apart.
They say Dubai's famed PR machinery indirectly helps the airline ticket discount airfare is having to change planes in either Reykjavik or Dublin. Northwest Airlines now flies direct to Amsterdam. Airlines like Southwest offer less expensive plane tickets, and a few countries. Another airport is that the airline ticket discount spain of waiting to have less aircraft choices and instead work really hard to compete with AC coaches of Indian Railways which speaks much about the airline ticket discount to cheaper trade routes.
As we commemorate the one year anniversary of Osama bin Laden’s death, let us remember President Barack Obama made a hard decision many others would not have made.
The second-floor included a replica jail cell and with a female warden's uniform from 1896, when four women were hired due to public demand after a sharp increase in female prisoners. There was also a display of Brooklyn Police Department badges prior to 1898 when the borough was still an independent city, and a 1920s slot-machine in front of mug shots of prominent gangsters of the time. The same room also had a large display of nineteenth and early-twentieth century handcuffs and guns. The first floor showcases examples of the uniform throughout the decades, and has a great collection of old motorcycles. Naturally, I asked if they were hiring, and naturally they said they weren't. But at least I got an enriching afternoon of New York City history for only eight bucks! If you're in town, I highly recommend it!
So what is Milligan and Murphy about? As we’ve seen with Beckett a great deal of his work concerns the fact that people are not in control of their lives. There are, for want of a better expression, other forces at play. This is probably shown clearest in the mime Act Without Words I where a man in a desert is tormented by an unseen party who lowers items, some of which he can reach, others of which he has to work to reach (by stacking cubes) and still others that are whisked out of his reach. Milligan and Murphy are instructed by their mother to go looking for work. On the way there, after discovering a lucky penny, they encounter an old man who gets them to think about where they should be going before vanishing mysteriously without saying goodbye. A minor detail? Perhaps, but not if he was a pooka. We never find out the old man’s name but it’s not hard to work out who he appears to be:
Got this top and pair of shorts
Skepoet Have you seen any demographic shifts in the The Summarland Grove Pagan Church?
Churchill served as Prime Minister from 1940 to 1945 and again from 1951- 55. He was the recipient of the Nobel Prize in literature in 1953.
Please do not hesitate to contact me if you have any questions or concerns. Have a great week-end!
Prune for shape in the first couple of years, then pruning is optional to cut out weak stems or contain the spread early in the season, or tidy up, just after flowering. Many of the large-flowered varieties (such as 'Nelly Moser' and 'Bee's Jubilee') and some of the doubles (such as 'Duchess of Edinburgh') can be treated this way (Group/Type 2 or B – sometimes called Group B1. Is it any wonder we get confused?).
Damn him for making her think about him, for making her want him.
Simple fun. Violent in its own way, but nobody was hurt and innocence was retained.
This wasn't my idea, I got the instructions for the album from Andrea Walford and her Family Treasures Scrapbook class. Family Treasures is a scrapbook kit that is no longer available, so I used the same album design, but rejigged it myself using one of our latest kits.
Add reserved mushroom mixture. Add remaining ingredients except tortillas.
These are not paint by numbers, or fuzzy posters, simply high-quality line art posters by assorted artists. Each print is on paper that is intended for use with Copic markers.
I am a mommy and I am good at it. Of course, I make my fair share of mistakes. I falter, I forget things, I snap sometimes at them for little things. But all in all, at the end of every day I think I can truly say that I focused on letting my kids just be kids. I don't care about my house looking perfect and clean (much to my hubs dismay). I don't care about having grand parties and being the home room mom. I just want my kids to go to bed each night knowing a)they are loved and b)they got to be themselves. I am confident in this! I am Mommy!
but now I am going to him who sent me. None of you asks me, ‘Where are you going?’ Rather, you are filled with grief because I have said these things. But very truly I tell you, it is for your good that I am going away. Unless I go away, the Advocate will not come to you; but if I go, I will send him to you. When he comes, he will prove the world to be in the wrong about sin and righteousness and judgment: about sin, because people do not believe in me; about righteousness, because I am going to the Father, where you can see me no longer; and about judgment, because the prince of this world now stands condemned.
A spider-man-traversing-a-city cake
every mention or u/s picture of my son was gone off his myspace.
And also like so many things I find on Tracey's website, the recipe was in a cookbook I own. For those of you who mastered the lemon cheesecake bars, these will be very familiar. I really like Alice's crust: it's almost a batter you spread in the pan...no fussy crust, no stress.
Stilled for the passing of her dreaming feet
The personal family centers on the belief that enhancing the learner as a person is a worthwhile educational goal. A major thesis of this family is that better-developed, more affirmative, self-actualizing learners have increased learning capabilities that can be realized by tending to their psyches (p.266). Consistent with this model is the theory of multiple intelligence that asserts that students learn in identifiably distinct ways, and therefore, would be better academically served by varying instruction to match students’ diverse learning styles while also varying the means of assessing their learning.
After so many years of quiet, why now at this age, did he decide to lend his voice and be a part of such a rally?
Ok, so this first one isn't really a chair. It's a demonic bench that is possibly concealing some kind of lumpy illegal contraband. The whole shamdangle is giving me nightmares, and I'm not even asleep yet. Holly found enough inner fortitude to start over and make it shine with glossy black paint and fun fabric. BETTER.
Set in Stone: Evidence for Earth’s Catastrophic Past
Golmaal Returns came up with great excitement since people was impatiently waiting for another comedy masala of Rohit Shetty. It did have the same basic starring as part I had. Ajay Devgan, Tushaar Kapoor, Arshad Warsi came in to the scene with the exception of Laxman role that played by Shreyas Talpade, which were previously played by Sherman Joshi. Such alternation was not digestible but good acting of Shreyas Talpade was appreciable to some extent. Apart from this, numerous addition we had to explore like plenty of heroins Kareena Kapoor, Amrita Aroora, Celina Jaitley, plenty of song collection. All over it was good comedy masala but inspite of such great additions people missed the charm of Golmaal.
MotoConcepts’ Mike Alessi, of Hilliard, Fla., captured the Nuclear Cowboyz® Holeshot Award to start the Supercross Class Main Event. Dungey didn’t wait long to make his move on Alessi to take the lead on Lap 1. Yoshimura Suzuki’s Brett Metcalfe, of Lake Elsinore, Calif., moved into second place on Lap 2, passing Alessi, and on the following lap, Monster Energy Kawasaki’s Jake Weimer, of Rupert, Idaho, found his way into third place.
orange moon shines
I’m sure that if you sit for a moment and allow your mind to think of things to be thankful for, you will be able to think of many, and it will bring joy to your heart.
I have been recently using xylitol, a plant-derived sugar alcohol. It has a low Glycemic Index rating. It subs for sugar one to one. It doesn't have the gross aftertaste that stevia does. But there is controversy over it, nonetheless. First, it is highly processed to finally arrive at its crystalline/granulated state. Any amount of processing = loss of whatever nutrients may have populated the whole food. Second, many people complain of digestive issues such as IBS-like symptoms after consuming xylitol. We've never had that problem in our family. And supposedly the issue resolves itself if you start eating it in small amounts and increase your intake slowly. Just gotta get ye ol' digestive track acclimated, I suppose. A word to the wise about xylitol, though, is that most xylitol is corn derived which means - dun, dun, dun - hello lovely genetic modification. Boo. Luckily, we found Emerald Forest Xylitol, which is made right here in the USofA from birch trees rather than corn. Yay! On the downside (again), I don't think birch trees are considered a "whole food" for human consumption, so anything derived from them (especially in such a processed manner), already has one strike against it from the get go. Boo. So, I'm definitely still conflicted as to whether this is THE sweetener we should be substituting for sugar. I'm leaning toward "no".
May 7 Denver, CO Pepsi Center
Nominate those 15 bloggers for the Versatile Blogger Award
Blogging, my new outlet. Devoted to Jesus is what I am. I’m an emotional girl to say the least. I depend upon my Lord and Savior, Jesus to guide me through the ups and downs of my life’s events. Each morning I try to gain wisdom and understanding while drinking my morning coffee. Praying with Jesus + God’s Word + Coffee = WISDOM.
Edward Ka-Spel is obsessive. He lives for music: in the first year of squatting in Amsterdam he went without food in order to plough all his slim resources into the Dots,and even his girlfriend has difficulty preventing him from spending his food money on obscure albums of experimental music. And Ka-Spel attracts obsessives. Fanzine writers pen lengthy treatises interpreting the densely woven tapestry of his lyrics (whose themes criss-cross from album to album to form an ongoing myth-world). Others engage with the music in a rather more negative fashion.
Standard Circles Lg
There are so many books that address various aspects of one’s health that there is hardly any condition that does not deal with a problem shared by others.
So what did these wizards of irony decide to send me an ‘offer’ for today? Speed Dating! I actually seriously thought about going but the age categories suck. Not for everyone, just for me. They’re broken out into groups of 35-45 year olds or 45 year olds plus. I thought about the 35-45 one, but I certainly don’t want to be the cause of an entire room full of 30 year olds gasping at the sight of the old lady dragging her oxygen tank and cane into the room. Yeah, that would be me. Wondering if it’s worth the whopping $15 just to get a blog post out of it?
I calmly hit the answer button and scrubbed my life clean of him. I was cleaning house and when I was done there would be no trace of him. He would be dust in a pan and I would move on without looking back.
Aim to Influence on Social Media is the 58th in a series of excerpts from our book, Be a Person: the Social Operating Manual for Enterprises (itself part of a series for different audiences). We’re just past page 180. At this rate it’ll be a long time before we get through all 430 pages, but luckily, if you’re impatient, the book is available in paper form at bit.ly/OrderBeAPerson and you can save $5 using Coupon Code 62YTRFCV
Active Time: 1 - 2hrs
Boulevard Rye-on-Rye (probably not likely to find bottles still lingering around, but it's starting to show up on tap at many places)
As this understanding takes root in us,
7. Without giving the plot away, what was the hardest aspect of writing the book? A scene, a character?
My current thinking on US intelligence agent Lee Harvey Oswald is that he was indeed involved in the JFK assassination, but he was a patsy who shot NO ONE that day, neither John Kennedy nor Officer J.D. Tippit. Both murders were complete frame jobs. Oswald was a fake defector to Russia and his behavior in New Orleans 1963 was all about Oswald’s sheep dipping as he passed out pro-Castro flyers and pretended to be a “pro-Castro Marxist.” Meanwhile Oswald was working in concert in New Orleans with folks like David Ferrie and Guy Bannister whose politics were the equivalent of a 1960’s Strom Thurmond or Jesse Helms. Oswald’s fake public persona as a “pro-Casto Marxist” meant that he was an ideal pick as a patsy and his likely knowledge of and/or participation in the JFK Assassination meant that he had to be murdered quickly. The folks who killed Oswald wanted a “dead Red” not a “talking head.” The JFK assassination was a deception provocation intended to facilitate a US military invasion of Cuba. It was that bad and ugly. A US invasion of Cuba might have provoked a broader war with Russia and from the point of view of some like Air Force General Curtis LeMay that was fine because, astoundingly, he wanted to wage and “win” a nuclear WWIII. Curtis LeMay hated Kennedy so much that a child could have recruited him into a plot to kill Kennedy. LeMay told Kennedy during the Cuban Missile Crisis that he was an appeaser equivalent to Neville Chamberlain for not bombing Cuba.
On Friday we visited Kids Rethink New Orleans Schools and spent some time learning about the relationship between oil industry, food systems, water, and the local New Orleans economy and toured the Rethink Garden. If it weren't for the rain and thunderstorms, we would have been able to get our hands dirty in the garden too. Thank you Qasim, Brennan and Micah!
d) The palm tree cannot be killed by cutting around it (like other trees can by cutting through the bark)… The palm tree grows from its heart outward. You can hack at it… kick it… bruise it… but you can’t hurt it… It works from the heart… Many Christians get hurt quickly because they grow from the outward only… by what they see… hear… and feel… Proverbs 15:30 teaches “a sound heart is the life of the flesh.” Proverbs 17:22 teaches that “a merry heart does you good.” The only thing that can kill a palm tree is extreme cold… Coldness kills a lot of Christians too.
“Tolerance” is growing to be more and more of a buzzword. There are plenty of ways to use it rightly, but unfortunately it gets thrown around a lot to give more clout to someone’s opinion by telling those who disagree that they are “intolerant,” an adjective which is supposed to make people gasp and bring great shame upon the one receiving it.
After all, what sort of burgeoning ecosystem does the world of foreclosed homes represent? Mold, lichen, and vines; bears, deer, and wildcats.
Lets go with Alamo. Try one of these codes and put it into the ID/ Corp ID field. This is reserved for corporate codes only. If you work for a big corporation, you might already have a code to use. But if you don’t have it handy or your employer isn’t big enough, it probably doesn’t have enough volume to draw a discount. Enter one of these: 7014172 (Allstate), 807303 (American Express), 675899 (Costco) or 706768 (International Student Organization). Enter your trip information and see what you get for rates. Select a car size then check out the price per week and if there is any credit. The credit should appear with a minus sign in front of the dollars like “-12.89″. If you don’t see anything then you’re not getting any discount. One more thing to try, enter AD7511SDN in the coupon code field. Try this again. If you have everything right, you should see a discount.
It’s like trying to play all the instruments in a band at once. Not many individuals can master all at once, but if you focus and practice on one before moving to the next, you would then be decent at many instruments.
I requested to be put on the ‘available anytime’ waiting list. This was in mid-December and I knew with my luck that I would likely get called in on Christmas Eve at 4am when I was 3 hours north of the city with my family. I didn’t care. I would take any appointment I could get! I received a phone call only 3 days later asking me to come in on a Monday morning, a week before Christmas at 3:45am. I practically fell off the chair with excitement and I’m pretty sure that after I got off the phone I cried with relief!
Kougar and Ariana have to over come their past in order to save both the Feral Warriors and the Ilina mist warriors from the evil Mage. And through some heart breaking moments the two come to an agreement to partner up to save their people.
As I was leaving my hair appointment the other night, I mentioned to young Sarah that I can help her family with life insurance, help them put together a budget (they didn’t have that either) or anything else like that. As she wrote down her email address for me, she turned and gave me this big smile and said, “You can be my financial coach!” Again, I was intrigued. So that’s what she wants—a “coach”—not an advisor and certainly not an agent. Sarah was drawn to the idea of having a financial coach.
There was too much of a language barrier between us for me to explain that where I come from, no ice stays dry.
What about the overall size? The garrett looks much larger than the cupola. Do we have a discrepancy #4? Actually, the cupola is bigger than you may think. From floor to the peaked tip is twelve and a half feet. In this case we have two needs working at cross-purposes, and the Imagineers had to compromise. They would want the actual cupola to be on the small side, if anything, to help make the building look bigger. But if they made it too small, the size difference between it and the stretchroom garrett would become noticeable. Finding the right compromise between these two needs may actually have driven the decision to build a six-sided cupola rather than an eight, thereby allowing large windows on a smallish cupola. Clever.
1pm – Boxty with special guest bestselling author Claudia Carroll - she’s really Nicola from Fair City – and she’s bringing her love rival Niamh with her!
They also have a Facebook page…:) Have a great Friday!!!!!
The artist knows when not to take the shot – not just because of poor light, but because the subject just doesn’t “feel right”
1 c. whole wheat flour
There are so many animals on the endangered species list, I almost don’t where to start. I think the issue most horrendous is the killing of these beautiful animals for their furs and feathers. Some humans are so insecure with their own appearance, they kill majestic creatures to steal their beauty. Here are two examples.
When too many women and a few men had it, this became Chronic Fatigue and has been deemed a real illness.
This daunting triple-CD set represents the first duo encounter between two very different elder statesmen of modern electroacoustic music. Keith Rowe, the longtime tabletop guitarist for the legendary AMM, is a versatile musician who has, especially in the last decade or so, all but defined a certain strain of thoughtful, sonically varied improvisational music. Radu Malfatti is a trombonist who originally came from a background in jazz and European free improvisation but has, since the early 90s, become a minimalist composer whose work charts the extreme edges of silence and austerity. This album, which documents virtually the entirety of the music that the duo recorded during three days in a Vienna studio, is fascinating because it so tangibly captures the process of finding a common ground between different musical methodologies, different backgrounds and ideas. The musicians settled on four compositions — one piece by each of them, plus two pieces by other composers, so that Malfatti and Rowe each chose two compositions to play — as a prelude to the duo improvisation that takes up the entire third disc of the set. The compositions provide a way of exploring the players' aesthetics, finding the points of overlap (which exist mainly to the extent that Rowe can inhabit the patience and sparseness of Malfatti's musical world) and the useful tensions.
Mr. Prince has one group of influential supporters: museum curators. The Solomon R. Guggenheim Museum in New York and the Walker Art Center in Minneapolis recently mounted major Prince shows. Christie's sold one of his paintings, "Ranting and Raving," on Tuesday for $722,500, just over its $600,000 low estimate.
Here comes the sun…here comes the sun…la-la-la….it’s all right….
Running late due to an early morning appointment for wheel alignment. In spite of the chill, I sat outside and sketched while the K-car was on the lift. As much as I enjoy the brilliance of the Peerless Watercolor Papers, I find them difficult to control and almost impossible to mix.
sea salt + freshly-cracked pepper
Ps 74:14 Thou brakest the heads of leviathan in pieces, and gavest him to be meat to the people inhabiting the wilderness.
Lisa and Laura are the sweetest, most generous people I've met. They could not have made us feel more welcome. And, we got to hang with the fantabulous and FUN Scott Tracey, Leah Clifford, Chelsea Swiggett, Loretta Nyhan, her friend Erin (who is equally fantastic) in addition to LiLa's incredibly awesome family. Seriously, I want one just like theirs, if even for just a few days (no, no I still want mine, but I wouldn't mind a trade some days. LOL) The Regulator, regulated (can I tell you how much I loved her!) and the third Roecker sister was just as sweet as her siblings (her smile lights up a room). In fact, the whole town of Hudson was packed full of seriously kind and genuine people. I loved it there.
All I can say is, this coat is the most practical thing I could have bought in Norway. It's warm, it's pretty and it's comfortable.
Anyway, to make the movie viewing more pleasurable, I like to play the movie on my laptop so I can connect it to a projector and speakers for a more cinematic experience.
Four days after the baptism I return to work. I am looking forward to getting back into the swing of things and diving into some new projects but I am going to desperately miss my little girl. Since becoming a mom I have learned how to be a mom this way- stay at home- and now I am going to have to relearn as a working mom. I just hope that it is an easy transition. I am also fearful of losing my milk once I go back to work. Breastfeeding has gone so well so far and I do want to continue as long as I can but you just never know what my work schedule has in store for me! My plan is to play it by ear and try to be as flexible as I can and hopefully my body will adapt and keep up (fingers crossed)!
From what we’ve heard, the Siri-based Assistant is described as the biggest game changer in this year’s iPhone. The system is the evolution of the Voice Control function that was introduced alongside the iPhone 3GS in 2009 and it is the fruit of Apple’s purchase of Siri last year.
In dire need of money to clear his father's debts, Gerald agrees right before the big win to sell his prize stallion to an American breeder. After the race, Elizabeth II, determined to keep the horse’s lineage properly British, offers up a better deal. The honorable choice is for Gerald to close the sale with the American -- but that means saying no to a very powerful and very stubborn queen.
French Cleats are sized by the weight of the object to hang; the above package can be used for items up to 60 lbs (upper left corner of package).
How do you STAND that shit?
Oil - 2 tablespoon
I include below a piece on my impressions of the conference which was published in theSun a few weeks ago.
8:42 PM – Josh Matthews finds CM Punk backstage to ask Punk about his gift, which is a basket of liquor. Well played, Y2J. Punk re-gifts his basket of liquor to Josh, but keeps one specific bottle. I can only hope that this bottle will be used for payback at Extreme Rules on Sunday.
Traditional Wrap = 180 calories, 5g fat, 2g protein, 30 carbs, 3g fiber
Karen Erickson has always loved the written word. From being one of the best readers in her kindergarten class to penning romantic stories that never ended about her favorite band members (Duran Duran) in high school, she always wanted to write. It just took her a while to seriously pursue it.
Author: Ernie Black
These cheesy mozzarella stuffed meatballs feature 3 different cheeses and are so delicious I recommend you make the whole recipe. Yes, it makes 32 meatballs. They freeze and refrigerate extraordinarily well, so I always make 2 pounds and freeze half. These amazing meatballs are sure to become a family favorite for you too!
The ones I remember are these ones on my page + three more, I dont have a good memory really! Martin Palermo (football player) – Jorge Lanata (journalist), Florencia de la V (Actrees), Charly Garcia (musician) – Villa Diamante (DJ) – Mauricio Macri (politician)… and Me (Art Entrepreneur)
A word about the subways. I kind of like them. At first, I was none too pleased. But they have grown on me. As opposed to the buses I used to take in Seattle, they are much faster, and one can wait for the subway underground as opposed to on the side of the street, completely exposed to the elements. Like other cities, there are two subway systems, the local and the express. We live right by an express stop, but I work close to a local stop, so I often have to transfer to the six to get to work. I take the express to Union Square, then transfer to the local. Much faster this way. However, on my way back, I hop on the six and ride it the entire way home, which usually takes over half an hour. But I love it. I know exactly which cars will be empty, so I always get a seat, take out a book and don’t worry about it. It’s perfect reading time.
I backed away slowly and waved goodbye. As I was making my way down the beach I heard fading in the distant “Obama! USA!” and laughter, it was all very surreal and I wished i had a picture of the situation but i caught the group from a distances in the photo below.
Rnd 4) ch2, dc in each st around, sl st to top of first st.
